 Home  List of Hobbies  50 Top Hobbies  Types of Hobbies  100 Celebrity Hobbies  NotSoBoringLife.com Helping You Find a New Hobby  Hobbies - Find Yourself a New Hobby Today!  We live in a world with access to so information and equipment we literally could spend our entire lives pursuing hobbies.  Sadly, most of us spend our lives working.  Striking a balance between work and play is essential to our health and well being.    I don't know about you, but I love hobbies. I might just spend more time collecting hobbies than I do actually doing my hobbies, so I started NotSoBoringLife.com. A site dedicated to hobbies. The best way to find a new hobby is to consult our List Of Hobbies page, where I've listed more than 200 different hobbies.  Another great resource is the 50 Most Popular Hobbies .  Either way you're bound to find something to suite your fancy.    Listed below are the different hobby categories.  Under each category you'll find the different hobbies and a short guide with what to expect, where to start, and what kind of budget you can expect to invest in your new hobby.  We're glad you stopped by and hope you're able to find a new hobby today!     Arts and Crafts Looking for a new arts and crafts hobby?  This section of NotSoBoringLife.com is dedicated to helping you find the perfect Arts and Crafts hobby.  Now you might be wondering why types of activities are considered arts and crafts.  Traditionally these are hobbies that require you to develop certain … Still Bored? Collecting Looking to start a new collection?  Not sure what to collect?  We've got a pretty good list to get your started, however this list will never be complete as you can literally collect anything and everything.

For some its the thrill of find.  Shopping in local thrift or antique stores.  Talking with other collectors.  But for others it's all … Still Bored? Dancing I'll be the first to admit that I'm not a very good dancer. At parties and clubs I'm the one swaying awkwardly back and forth, hoping nobody notices my lack of "moves." Yes, I'll never make it onto So You Think You Can Dance...

But there's good news!

Anyone can learn how to dance. Are you … Still Bored? Extreme Sports Looking for an adrenaline rush?  These extreme sports are sure to get your blood pumping. Check out our list of extreme sports and let us know what we've missed.

Thanks to the X-Games extreme sports have come a long way and many are now mainstream sports.  However you won't find the faint of heart participating.  Many of these sports are over … Get Extreme! Food and Drink Looking for a tasty hobby? Think 4 course meal, an amazing wine.  Maybe a 60 year old bourbon and perhaps a full bodied cigar to finish off the evening.  What could be better than that?

Your friends will love you if you pick up a hobby in the food and drink category.  We all have to eat and drink so taking these hobbies to the next level will bring not only you pleasure but also those enjoying Games Games can be played with friends.  Games can be played in solitude.  Games can be played online.  Games can be played indoors or outdoors.  We all love playing games.  Board games.  Puzzles.  Computer Games.  You get the idea.  Lets explore this category of hobbies and see if we can't help you find a new game or two.

Feel free to drop us a comment about your favorite games! Music Looking for a hobby with a beat?  Check out a few of these musical hobbies. Outdoor Hobbies Outdoor hobbies are simply amazing.  With such an amazing world all around us, how could anyone resist the great outdoors?

Below is a great big list of outdoor hobbies.  Hopefully they will inspire you to get out for some fresh air this weekend.  If you don't see anything interesting, but have something on your mind, please send us a quick comment with the form below.  We'd love to hear your RC Hobbies Are you on the hunt for a new RC hobby?  RC hobbies can provide hours of entertainment no matter which radio controlled hobby you decide is right for you.  This page contains some brief information about each of the main RC Hobbies and makes some recommendations for you to get started in the right direction.  Since this is a hobby website, we generally won't recommend the entry level models but if  Subscribe to NotSoBoringLife                     Pages   100 Celebrity Hobbies  50 Most Popular Hobbies  About  Advertise  Arts and Crafts   Candle Making   Candle Making Supplies  Candle Making Tips  Making Container Candles  Making Votive Candles    Knitting   Binding Off  How to Purl  Knitting the First Row  Pattern Reading    Painting  Photography   Making Money Off Photography    Scrapbooking    Collecting   Action Figures  Button Collecting  Coin Collecting  Collecting Antique Dolls  Collecting Gadgets  Collecting James Bond Toys  Toy Collecting  TV Shows for Collectors    Contact  Dancing   Ballroom Dancing  Belly Dancing  Jazz Dancing  Line Dancing  Tap Dancing    Drama   Lego Dramas  Story Telling    Extreme Sports   Flying  Grip Strength   Crush Grip  Pinch Strength    Mountain Biking  Rock Climbing  Scuba Diving   Advanced Certifications  Careers in Scuba Diving  Scuba Activities  Scuba Certification  Scuba Equipment  Types of Scuba Diving    Shark Fishing   Big Mako Shark  Catch and Release Shark Fishing  Deploying Shark Bait  My First Shark  North Carolina Shark Fishing  Rigging Shark Bait  Shark Bait  Shark Fishing Gear and Tackle  Shark Fishing Locations  Virginia Shark Fishing    Sky Diving    Food and Drink   Beer Brewing   Beer Brewing Supplies  Brewing Process  Brewing Process Part 2  Grading Your Home Brew  How to Brew Beer  Types of Beer    Cigar Smoking  Pipe Smoking – Learn How To Smoke a Pipe   Art of Smoking a Tobacco Pipe  Breaking In a New Pipe  Buying a Tobacco Pipe  Buying Estate Pipes  Buying Pipe Tobacco  Must Have Pipe Accessories  Pipe Collection  Review of MacQueen Pipe – Classic Churchwarden  Tips and Tricks  Tobacco Pipe Parts      Games   Backgammon  Playing Poker   Hand Rankings  Poker Strategy  Texas Holdem    Slots  Tetris   Next Level of Tetris  Tetraminoes Vs 3D Tetris  Where to Play Tetris    Yo-Yo    Hobby Guides   Shark Fishing Guide    List of Hobbies  Music   Beatboxing   Bass Drum  Kick Drum and Hi Hat    Jazz Appreciation  Playing Guitar   Music Lessons    Playing Piano   Online Piano Lessons  Piano Teachers      Outdoor Hobbies   Astronomy  Bird Watching  Bonsai Trees   Fall Bonsai Tree Care  Growing Healthy Bonsai Trees  Indoor Bonsai Trees  Pruning Bonsai Trees for Beginners  Springtime Care For Your Bonsai Trees  Summer Bonsai Tree Care  Using Drainage Mesh on Bonsai Trees  Winter Bonsai Tree Care    Butterfly Watching  Camping   5 Killer Camping Spots  Camping Gear to Pack  Choosing a Camping Tent    Cloud Watching  Hot Air Ballooning  Motorcycle Riding  Throwing Boomerangs  Travel   5 Packing Tips  Couch Surfing  Hostels      Pets   Pet Snakes    Privacy Policy  ramblings   Three Best Parasite Cleanses for Intestinal Parasites    RC Hobbies   RC Airplanes  RC Boats  RC Cars and RC Trucks    Sports   BodyBuilding  Running  Swimming  Walking    Terms Of Use  Types of Hobbies    Return to top of page Copyright © 2018 · Magazine Theme on Genesis Framework · WordPress · Log in     #^$    After more than 19 years, and over two million questions answered, AllExperts.com is now closed. We apologize for any inconvenience.  You can find our latest Expert-answered content at Thoughtco.com .  #^$                        Home   Have




                                  Your Figurines Appraised   Contact





                                  Us       "  Is my
                                              item worth having
                                              appraised? "   Is a very
                                                  good question, nobody
                                                  wants to spend money
                                                  to find out an item is
                                                  worthless. This rarely
                                                  happens, our records
                                                  from 1996-2014 show
                                                  that 97% of the
                                                  figurines sent to us
                                                  for appraisal have
                                                  been worth more than
                                                  $50.00. To date the
                                                  highest valued item we
                                                  have uncovered was
                                                  valued at $80,000.00.   The piece pictured
                                                  above was a unexpected
                                                  surprise for one of
                                                  our customers, it's a
                                                  bronze after an
                                                  original by the French
                                                  sculptor Antoine Louis
                                                  Barye 
                                                  (1796-1875). In
                                                  today's market this piece cast
                                                  by Susse Freres
                                                  foundry after Barye's
                                                  death would sell in
                                                  $6,000 to $9,000 range. It had been
                                                  sitting in the back of
                                                  a china cabinet since
                                                  the 1970's.       Why should
                                                  you use our service?     On





                                our forum you can have your appraisal
                                ready for you within one working day, in
                                some cases within two hours.     We have been providing
                                  Appraisal information for Insurance,
                                  Estate, Tax & Probate purposes
                                  since 1959.     Current
                                Appraisal information for a wide range
                                of antiques & collectible items can
                                be hard to find, even on the internet.     Have your
                                appraisal emailed directly to you in 48
                                hours.     Price guides
                                already two years out of date when
                                published and often give only a minimum
                                of information.     Specialized
                                reference information is expensive and
                                often difficult to find at your local
                                library or bookstore.     Professional
                                appraisers fee's range from $ 75.00
                                to  $400.00 per hour, and
                                appraisers are booked weeks in advance.      How do
                                    we get our appraisal information?    We monitor all
                                the major Auction Houses world wide for
                                the most up to date sales results.     We monitor
                                Auction sales results from several
                                Online Auctions daily and add these
                                results weekly to our database.     We subscribe to
                                all the Major & Minor Antique &
                                Collectible trade publications.     Our Reference
                                library is constantly growing, some of
                                our books about Antique collecting &
                                restoration date to the 1820's!     We regularly
                                participate in Roadshow type events,
                                shows and auctions to maintain contact
                                with those in the trade.     What
                                    will my appraisal look like?  We use the same research methods for our Online Appraisals as  we
                              do for our regular appraisals for
                              Insurance, Tax or Estate  purposes that follow the
                              USPAP guidelines (Uniform Standards
                              of  Professional










                              Appraisal Practice).  Note that our
                              appraisals  are










                              based on the images and information you
                              send us, please read our disclaimer about Hypothetical












                                Appraisals                    Our
                                      Valuation Services  Same Day Valuations on our Forum for:  - Royal









                                  Doulton Figurines - Royal









                                  Doulton Toby Jugs  -Lladro









                                  Figurines  -Royal









                                  Copenhagen Figurines  -Hummel









                                  Figurines  -Collector's









                                  Plates of all Types     Hot Item of
                                      the Week    The owner of this Royal Doulton figurine
                                contacted us for an appraisal after they
                                had inherited it. It's called "Charge of
                                the Light Brigade", a model HN371 designed





                                by Alan Maslankowski. They thought it
                                might be worth about $350.00, but were
                                shocked to find out this one was part of
                                a limited edition by Royal Doulton, and
                                routinely sells at auction for over
                                $4500.00 USD.                    Copyright Wilcox & Hall Appraisers-All Rights Reserved
        1997-2014           #^$        Home About  Charity  Do I Need An Appraisal?  Appraisal Request Form   Menu              Previous Next        Antique Appraisals by Allan Baitcher   Allan Baitcher is recognized as one of the leading antique and personal property appraisers and auctioneers in the United States.From high-end cars, to multi million dollar necklaces, to President Eisenhower’s private paneled room, Allan has sold it all.Considered perhaps the most knowledgeable appraiser in the United States as well as one of the country’s foremost auctioneers, Allan currently travels throughout the world as a professional appraiser for private individuals, museums, and collections.His private client list reads like a who’s who in the art, collectables, and museum world.In addition, Film celebrities, national sports figures, recording industry stars, and many others utilize his expertise and heed his advice in their high-end acquisitions and sales.         Insurance Appraiser  Over 50 major insurance companies utilize Allan Baitcher’s expertise annually for a wide variety of reasons. Claims, loss prevention, proof of existence, valuation, and documentation are just a few of the services he provides daily.          Charity Work  Mr. Baitcher is  well known in charity circles as the leading volunteer auctioneer in the world, having raised millions of dollars both nationally as well as locally for The Georgia Transplant Foundation, Habitat for Humanity, The Make a Wish Foundation, The Muscular Dystrophy Association, CURE, and dozens of other well recognized national organizations.          Legal Expert  Mr. Baitcher is a “Legal expert” as defined by the court in numerous states, works frequently for the United States Customs Service, and has been recognized many times as a highly qualified antiques expert by numerous government agencies and legal entities.            Antique Appraisals © 2018    #^$                       Old farm ornaments, from Europe  A reliable source for farm antiques, antiques for the garden.  Our antique landscape ornaments are unique. No reproduction!  They are heritage garden ornaments, many years of work,  and a bit of history and culture that you may add  to your garden decoration or farm decor.  Our name is Hoga, HOGAcompany.  oldgarden@hogacompany.com     It
is not the entry to the Eden, only your main access to our inventory    Be Welcome!  Our thanks to  Tripod   2000.01.29          #^$        Circa 
				1902-1960    ANTIQUE FISHING LURES      &  LURE BOXES     Copyright 1997      Antique Lures    Advanced Knowledge About Collecting   Antique Fishing Lures   "Lures Wanted: 
				single pieces or whole collections bought"   Featuring extensive 
			educational, pricing, photos, and identification information for 
			pre-1960 antique  fishing lures and lure boxes.   Phillip "Gabby" 
			Talkington   Life Member:  
			National Fishing Lure Collectors Club       AntiqueLures Website is about:  Early 
	(pre-1960) antique fishing lures and lure boxes made by:  Heddon, Shakespeare, Pflueger, 
	South Bend, Creek Chub , 
	as well as dozens of smaller pre-1940 companies.   This is where you can  sell your lures or find information about:    Educational 
		material on early fishing lure collecting and identification    How to grade 
		antique lures and lure boxes    Pricing of wood 
		lures and lure boxes and where to find books on old fishing lures    A toll free 
		phone number to call if you want to sell your collection or individual 
		lures    Early fishing 
		lure history, manufacturer's catalogs, and lure box brochures    Referral 
		services for people who want to sell their lures to a collector    How to collect 
		and what you need to know to survive this hobby     Heddon, dates, manufacture, lure 
		name, slopenose, Dowagiac, underwater, minnow, Slopenose Dowagiac,  
		Expert, Dowagiac Minnow, Coast Minnow, Light Casting Minnow, Florida 
		Special, Florida Special, Baby Dowagiac, Walton Feather Tail, Artistic 
		Minnow, Dowagiac Minnow, River Runt, Torpedo, Flipper, SOS, Surface 
		Minny, Surface Minnow, Musky Surfusser, Ice Decoy, Killer, Multiple 
		Metal Minnow, Salt Water Special , Musky Minnow, Swimming Minnow, Black 
		Sucker, Dummy Double, Deep diving Wiggler, Near Surface Wiggler, Crab 
		Wiggler, Baby Crab Wiggler, Midget Crab Wiggler, Spin Diver,    This 
	extensive educational site presents a quality antique 
	lure collection as both art and history from the early part of this 
	century.   If you would like to collect  or sell antique lures, this is the 
	place to learn how, however there is nothing on the site made after 1960.  Keep 
	going, you ENTER the main Website below...      AntiqueLures Website 
				was the first antique lure and tackle site on the web.    It was created and 
				copyrighted Feb. 1, 1997              The Miller's 
			Reversible             As 
					featured on:  Chicago's WGN-TV    A 
					"Hot Site " 
					pick on USA TODAY   BEST OF 
					THE NET on About.Com             This site has 
					been reviewed or featured in: multiple magazines, on 
					national and local TV, by dozens of Web site reviews, by 
					national and international collector and fishing 
					publications, and they all.... loved it.            ENTER   AntiqueLures   ENTER Pre-1920 Heddon Lures and Boxes  #^$        THE LARGEST AND FASTEST GROWING ANTIQUE
    RESTORATION WEB SITE ON THE INTERNET, BOOKMARK THIS PAGE    ENTER HERE       330,000 HITS per month Average Number of Visitors Per Month 75,000   Average Number of Page Views Per Month 182,000    Source....Web Trends Reports   Copyright © 1998-2017 by James Lane, all
    rights reserved. Text, graphics, and HTML code are protected by US and International
    Copyright Laws, and may not be copied, reprinted, published, translated, hosted, or
    otherwise distributed by any means without explicit permission.  Trademarks and terms of use.   #^$            Home  Staff  Insurance Programs   Dealers   Auctioneer  Coin Dealer  Collector Club  Dishonesty Bond  Mall Dealer  Mall Owner  Shop Owner  Show Dealer  Show Promoter    Collectors   Coin Collector  General Collector    Collector Car  Personal Jewelry    ACNA Membership  Resources  Upcoming Shows  Contact Us                      WELCOME TO ACIG      Antiques & Collectibles Insurance Group provides specialty insurance coverage for Collectors and Dealers in the Antiques and Collectibles industry.                                         Antiques & Collectibles Insurance Group      The Antiques & Collectibles National Association was established in 1991. The purpose of the association was to provide ever-expanding benefits and insurance programs for the Antiques & Collectibles industry. Today we are the largest national association of antique dealers & collectors in the country with over 3,000 members in all 50 states.  The Antiques & Collectibles Insurance Group is the name of the insurance department. We currently have three insurance companies we write business with. They are all either A or A+ AM Best Rated. Presently we offer individual Collector policies as well as Liability, Inventory, and Building coverage for Dealers in the antiques & collectibles industry.                   BACK TO TOP                 © 2018 Antiques & Collectibles Insurance Group         #^$  Skip to main content               Search       Search This Blog                     Appraisal Day - Online Art & Antique Appraisals               Home    About    Submit an Item    Recent Submissions    Items for Sale by Users    More…   Live Events         Home    About    Submit an Item    Recent Submissions    Items for Sale by Users    Live Events          Home    About    Submit an Item    Recent Submissions    Items for Sale by Users    Live Events              Posts   Featured              March 23, 2018       For over 35 years I have been appraising art and antiques.  This was one of my most memorable appraisals. At a fund raising event for a college a women stood in line for about two hours.  She finally made it to my table holding a small painting of a dory lying on the beach. It was well done by a known artist who signature you could easily read.  I told her it was worth between $2000 and $3000 at auction and maybe a bit more retail.  She thanked me and took a business card.  About a month later she called and said she had another painting but it wasn't as good because it wasn't signed.  She made an appointment and showed it to me.  The painting was a wonderful example of Luminism (works that emphasize tranquility, and often depict calm, reflective water and a soft, hazy sky).  I immediately told her it was worth a great deal more than the other work. I promptly began research that centered on two key aspects.  The scene itself depicting a very prominent rock formation and th…        Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps          Read more          Contact Appraisalday     Name   Email *    Message *                Latest Posts              March 22, 2018         A Rose is a Rose is a Rose       Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps                        March 21, 2018         American Art Pottery       Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps                        March 20, 2018         It's Magic       Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps                        March 20, 2018         Oh Deer! Norton Pottery Jug       Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps                        March 19, 2018         Tiffany Studios Peony Lamp       Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps                        March 19, 2018         Why Don't My Kids Want My Stuff!       Share         Get link         Facebook         Twitter         Pinterest         Google+         Email         Other Apps                          Powered by Blogger   Copyright 1999-2018 Appraisalday.com.  All rights reserved.                    Paul   Paul is a nationally known fine art, antique & collectibles appraiser with over 35 years experience.  He has appeared on several popular TV shows and major media outlets.  He has appraised individual objects valued over $2 million and collections valued over $10 million.   Visit profile     Contact Appraisalday     Name   Email *    Message *                  View recent stories                March 2018 7          Search this site              Archive                March 2018 7             Labels             antique 1  antique lighting 1  appraisal 1  art glass 1  Emile Gallé 1  Tiffany Studios 1        Report Abuse        #^$........       Charles Locksmith.com  Antique Locksmith Founded in 1957       Home  The Padlock Paradise   Large Padlocks  Non-Woking Padlocks  Small Padlocks  Working Padlocks    Skeleton Keys In the Closet   Barata Collection  Tiffany Collection  Novelty Keys  Bulk Order Keys    Door Hardware   Door Locks  Door knobs  Door Hinges  Strike Plates  Door & Key Roses    Full-Service Locksmiths   Full Service  Return and Shipping Policies    Contact   Contact Us           The Internet's Premier Antique  Locksmith Founded in 1957    Contact Us  Charles Locksmith Inc. 185 East 80th. Street New York, NY 10021 Call:917-992-1750 Call:212-879-2740 email us or complete our  contact form .     Welcome to  Charles Locksmith.com  With a giant collection of mortise locks, skeleton and wardrobe keys, padlocks, antique and reproduction door hardware as well as a team of full-service locksmiths we are your one source for all your security and Hardware needs!    Buy some of our keys in bulk and receive extra low prices! Check out the BULK KEYS COLLECTION for more information by clicking the image above! Browse the Master Lock  library categories below to learn more about combination padlocks.    The Padlock Paradise   Skeleton Keys in the Closet   Door Hardware   Antique, unique and reproduction padlocks.  One of the most diverse collection of skeleton keys that you're going to find.  Looking for knob roses, rim & mortise locks, door strike and hinges? It's a all right here!     Full-Service Locksmiths     Full Service Locksmiths     Hardware Restoration   With professionally trained technicians and an extensive inventory we are your answers to all your security needs!  An on-line encyclopedia with facts and figures for you to explore.  We can bring your old hardware back to life and looking like new!         Home | About -us | Contact Us  Charles Locksmith Inc.  185 East 80th. Street New York, NY 10021 Call:917-992-1750  Copyright © 2013 | designed by Samwel Sitienei       #^$               Go to noframes version           Go to noframes version   #^$       currierprints.com                Original Currier  Ives Lithographs  Antique Frames  Restore Prints  Collectors Books  Print Conservation  American Historical Antiques         Related Links:  Original Currier  Ives Lithographs  Antique Frames         mmmmmmmmmmlli mmmmmmmmmmlli#^$                Visit  About Us   General Information  History  Contact Us  Annual Report    Our Instruments   Nickelodeons  Music Boxes  Phonographs  Other Antique Instruments    Membership  Donate  Newsletters  Links  Shop  Blog             Search for:                      Events  February 11, 2017 - by DeBence    DeBence Mini-Event Series              Collection  February 11, 2017 - by DeBence    See Our Instruments              Events  February 11, 2017 - by DeBence    DeBence Mini-Event Series              Collection  February 11, 2017 - by DeBence    See Our Instruments              Events  February 11, 2017 - by DeBence    DeBence Mini-Event Series              Collection  February 11, 2017 - by DeBence    See Our Instruments           New at DeBence!   01 DeBence Mini-Event Series 02 See Our Instruments             Collection        Collection     See Our Instruments             Events        Events     DeBence Mini-Event Series             Blog        Blog     Our Newest Blog Post                    Search for:                2017 DeBence Antique Music World-1261 Liberty St, Franklin, PA 16323.  All rights reserved.					
					Created by Macho Themes                   #^$                          Home About Us  About Us Fine Art & Tiffany Lamp Expert Blog References Brokerage Services Tiffany Lamps Art Glass Artwork  American Painters European Painters Old Masters Evaluation Form Contact  Go to... Home About Us  About Us Fine Art & Tiffany Lamp Expert Blog References Brokerage Services Tiffany Lamps Art Glass Artwork  American Painters European Painters Old Masters Evaluation Form Contact               We Are Professional Antique Tiffany Lamp and Fine Art Brokers          Fine Art Brokers and Tiffany Studios Lamp Experts    admin    2017-12-13T14:46:52+00:00     As fine art brokers and Tiffany Studios lamp experts, we have over 45 years of experience in the business of evaluating, authenticating and selling major paintings and artwork, (American and European) antique Tiffany Studios lamps and Tiffany Studios art glass. We are Private Brokers , not auctioneers or dealers.  We do not purchase items outright or maintain an inventory of items for sale. Likewise, we do not offer items at public auction.  We will assure you in writing of a professional and discreet sale, with no commissions or seller’s fees to you!  Fine Art Investments’ main purpose is to act as private, expert fine art brokers . We help anyone needing help in selling authentic, antique Tiffany lamps or major American and European paintings by well known American and European artists. Our firm offers full service brokerage services to evaluate, authenticate and sell your American and European paintings by major artists from the 17th century to around 1985. We have over 45 years evaluating, authenticating and acting as brokers for authentic Tiffany Studios lamps, including antique table lamps, floor lamps and hanging shades.      Tiffany Lamps      Tiffany Art Glass      American Artists      European Artists          LOOKING FOR SPECIFICS ON HOW WE CAN HELP YOU SELL YOUR TIFFANY LAMP?  Click Here to Visit our Antique Tiffany Lamps Website Fine Art Investments are experienced, expert fine art brokers who authenticate and privately sell antique, original American oil paintings and original European oil paintings by well-known artists. We accomplish this using our 45 years of experience as professional art experts, private art brokers and fine art appraisers. Our job is acting as your exclusive American or European paintings expert, appraiser and private broker. W e are not dealers, or auction houses with many employees  high rent and high advertising costs . Our lower overhead enables us to sell your antique Tiffany lamps or to broker your major American or European oil painting and get you a very good price. The important difference is that there is no cost to you. Our clients are guaranteed both a sale and a guaranteed “net” price to them in writing – in advance.  If you have a signed authentic Tiffany lamp, or an oil painting you know or believe to be by a well-known American or European artist,  please give us a call. We will tell you what we need for photos and other information. Better yet, take 2-3 minutes and click on the appropriate Evaluation Form below. It is quick and easy. You will immediately be directed to the proper form to complete. When completed, simply click “Submit.” You will hear back from us within 24 hours.       Our Buyers Are Currently Seeking:   Antique Tiffany Studios lamps (table lamps, floor lamps, desk lamps, hanging lamps and chandeliers)  American and European paintings by major artists (19th – 20th century)  Old Master Paintings (16th through the 18th century)      Questions?  For questions regarding a specific item in your possession, please take a minute to complete our fine art brokers’ short online Artwork Evaluation & Information Form or Lamp Evaluation & Information Form . These forms will provide us with the type of information we need to better assess what you have, and do our best to evaluate its potential for interest to our buyers. Just click below on the appropriate bar.      Click Here for our Art Evaluation Form     Click Here for our Lamp Evaluation Form              As Fine Art Brokers We Have Many Buyers For Signed Original Paintings By American Artists Such As:  19th Century American: J.G. Brown, Fairfield Porter, Thomas Birch, Thomas Sully, James Bard, Guy Wiggins, Joseph Whiting Stock, Charles Nahl, Martin Heade, George Inness, Robert S. Dunning, Edward Moran, Herman Herzog, William Trost Richards and many others.  20th Century American: Andy Warhol, Lee Krasner, David Park, John Marin, Richard Diebenkorn, James Everett Stuart, Mark Chagall, Thomas Hart Benton, Mark Tansey, Gene Davis, Paul Reed and many others.           We Also Have Buyers For European Paintings By Artists Such As:  19th Century European: Eugene Boudin, Berthe Morisot, John Constable, Edouard Cortes, Adolph Kauffman, Frederick Cordey, Honore Daumier, Karl Bodmer, Marcel Dyf, Henri Cross and many others.  20th Century European: Albert Marquet, Charles Camoin, Louis Valtat, Henri Evenepoel, Maurice Marinot, Jean Puy, Maurice de Vlaminck, Henri Manguin,  Othon Friesz, Alice Bailly, and many others.                 Fine Art Brokers   •   515-226-0606   •   6565 Wistful Vista Dr. #6205   •    West Des Moines, IA 50266              © Copyright 1997 - 2018 Fine Art Investments | All Rights Reserved | Site by Fox Web Design                      Go to Top#^$      recorders like ampex revox nagra, akai bang & olufsen, berlant, and  brenell, concertone sony, teac, tape 
              recorder ferrograph pioneer tandberg telefunken grundig wollensak 
              roberts valve tube circuit diagram schematic owner's manual get 
              reel EMI leevers rich vintage philips elizabethan walter simon ASC 
              open reel concord magnecord geloso                      Click on the magic 
              eye to enter                #^$        Shop   What's New?  Sitemap  View Cart       Help   Help & Support  FAQ  Contact Us       Profile   About Us  How did we start?  Virtual Tour  Press Releases  Testimonials       Resources   Articles  Newsletter  Links                  Medical Antiques   Medical Diagnostic Instruments  Medical Dental Instruments  Medical Therapeutic Instruments    Judaica & Jewish Coins   Hasmonean Coins  Bar Kochba Coins  Herodian Coins  Procurator Coins  Jewish Revolt Coins  Judaica    Scientific Instruments   Astronomy  Calculating  Drawing Instruments  Length Measuring  Meteorology  Navigational  Scientific Optical  Pressure Measuring  Surveying Instruments  Volume & Capacity  Teaching Instruments    Photography Objects   Early Photographic Prints  Folding Cameras  Stereoscopy    Old Maps and Globes   Jerusalem Maps  Facsimile Maps  Globes  Holy Land Maps    Time Telling Instruments   Hourglasses and Sandglasses  Sundials  Clocks & Watches    Antique Tools   Braces & Drills  General Tools  Hammers & Mallets  Levels and Plumb Bobs  Measuring Tools  Planes & Shaves  Saws & Knives  Wrenches & Turnscrews    Optical Instruments   Binoculars & Opera Glasses  Spectacles & Eye Glasses  Magnifying Glasses and Lenses    Balance Scales & Weights   Spring Scales  Weights  Equal Arm Scales  Unequal Arm Scales    Writing Inst. and Inkwells   Inkwells  Pens and Pencils    Silver & Pewter Utensils   Pewter  Silver Tableware    Canes & Walking Sticks   Canes    General Collectibles   Books on Collectibles  Die Cast  Dolls  Smoking Implements  Gifts  Miscellaneous Antiques           Length Measuring  Rulers in units of Centimeter, ell, fathom, foot, hands, inch, meter, millimeter, rod. Architect rules with inter- changeable scales. Circumference measuring devices  Micrometers, Yardsticks, Ell rules, Thickness gauges.  Browse Length Measuring           Small Glass Inkwell Amber  Amber colored cast glass inkwell with brass top. 10 X 10 cm  View Item    Small Glass Inkwell Blue  Colored cast glass inkwell with brass top. 10 X 10 cm  View Item       Hanging in the Balance - Antique Scales  The rapid development of electronics and computerization in the mid 20th century, and the invention of...  Read more       Martha Sterling-Golden Maine USA (Early Photography)  Received the package today - beautiful!  My grandparents had purchased  the postcards when traveling...  Read more      Home  Latest Items  Site Map  Newsletter  Help  FAQ  About Us  Contact  View Cart  גילאי - המרכז לאספנות  Testimonials  Press Releases     Development: Epoch | Design: Luch Copyright © 1999-2018 Gilai Collectibles. All Rights Reserved    #^$     UKULELES for SALE   Aloha & welcome to the home of the Hawaii All-Collectors Show , and the Wiki Wiki One Day Vintage Collectibles & Hawaiiana Shows .
Dozens of Hawaiian antiques stores all under one roof where you may shop for Hawaiian jewelry, aloha shirts, Hawaiiana, antiques, vintage, art and collectibles.  Our show & sales are held four times annually at the Blaisdell Center in Honolulu. Four fun days a year, the biggest antiques, vintage and collectibles store in Hawaii.       Hawaii All-Collectors Show - HAWAIIANA, VINTAGE & antiques show. Next year's 2018 show, a one-day show, will be held on Sunday July 15 in the LARGE BLAISDELL EXHIBITION HALL.  Wiki Wiki One Day Show - A one day vintage collectibles, ANTIQUES & Hawaiiana show. 2018 Wiki Wiki shows will be held on March 18, September 30, and November 18. ALL WIKI WIKI SHOWS are held in the BLAISDELL HAWAII SUITES.   What's New! - The latest collectibles news and show schedule in Hawaii.     Media Credits - Featuring ukulele.com in the media.   Much Ado About Ukuleles - Bits & pieces about ukuleles, including some exploding vintage ukuleles.   Ongoing Collectibles Related Events - Goings on
Around the Town: Museums, flea markets, etc.   Collector's Spotlight - A visit to the Kamaka ukulele factory, plus, we visit 2 flea markets in Japan.   GoHawaii.com - The official visitor site to find Hawaii related events.          Waterlilies in Paradise - Tropical Waterlilies and Lotus plants.   50th State Big Time Wrestling - Vintage Hawaii pro wrestling in the 1960s and 1970s. Oooooh yeah!   Ilene's saimin search & blog - Coming soon!      #^$   Skip to main content            Welcome Anonymous!  Login  Register  Help                      Get An Appraisal Now!  Post a Classified!                Menu Home Browse - Browse Classifieds Blog Forums Events Q&A - Ask a Question About Menu Home Browse - Browse Classifieds Blog Forums Events Q&A - Ask a Question About           Home Browse Classifieds Blog Forums Events Q&A About                                                                                                                                                                           What is InstAppraisal?   Click to learn more!           Congratulations to the winner of our latest InstAppraisal Points Challenge! Each win earns a $25 Amazon.com Gift Card!   Most Overall Points: Albo            Click here to find out more about InstAppraisal Points!         Recently Posted Items (active tab) Featured Appraisals Items Posted For Sale             Vintage Armoire by White Fine Furniture   This armoire by White Fine Furniture, was given to me as a gift about 25 years ago in Los Angeles. I don't know much about it, but it measures 42...    This armoire by White Fine Furniture, was given to me as a gift about 25 years ago...     Leave a comment            Antique Press?   I'm dealing with my fathers Estate right now and came across this .I believe it's some type of press but not shore.Looking for what the age may be,...    I'm dealing with my fathers Estate right now and came across this .I believe it...     Leave a comment            F & EF Lamp 145-4-5x 1972   Glass Hurrican Lamp with painted fruit.    Glass Hurrican Lamp with painted fruit.     Leave a comment            Antique cast Iron Kitchen Wood stove   I have a Grand Perfection wood stove that you can bake in at my fathers estate in CT. It's in good condition with no cracks and doors are in working...    I have a  Grand Perfection wood stove that you can bake in at my fathers estate...                Gottlieb pinball machine   Have a Gottlieb Royal flush pinball machine that still works.Not shore of age or value is can anyone help?    Have a Gottlieb Royal flush pinball machine that still works.Not shore of age or...                Old (60-80's) plastic toy cars set   This is a set of 12 plastic toy cars that was given to me late 70's or early 80's but may date back more than that.    This is a set of 12 plastic toy cars that was given to me late 70's or early 80...     Leave a comment            1916 Vase & Stand   1916 Vase 400 cm in height Stand 120 cm In excellent condition    1916 Vase 400 cm in height
Stand 120 cm
In excellent condition     Leave a comment            Portrait Jackie Gleason   Original oil portrait of Jackie Gleason done in the 1960’s. It’s about 18x24 and the artist is Persona. Can’t seem to find any oil paintings of...    Original oil portrait of Jackie Gleason done in the 1960’s.  It’s...     Leave a comment       Click to see more antique & collectible appraisals!                  Antique cast Iron Kitchen Wood stove   I have a Grand Perfection wood stove that you can bake in at my fathers estate in CT. It's in good condition with no cracks and doors are in working...    I have a  Grand Perfection wood stove that you can bake in at my fathers estate...             Gottlieb pinball machine   Have a Gottlieb Royal flush pinball machine that still works.Not shore of age or value is can anyone help?    Have a Gottlieb Royal flush pinball machine that still works.Not shore of age or...             Stone china pitcher   Found this in my grandmother's basement. It has one flaw, which is a chip on the spout. The mark leads to believe it was Trenton potters co., but I...    Found this in my grandmother's basement. It has one flaw, which is a chip on the...             Louis Phillipe buffet   Appears to be walnut front with oak sides. Dimensions are 23"d x 53"w x 90"h. Four doors and three drawers. Plank construction interior. Said to be...    Appears to be walnut front with oak sides.  Dimensions are 23"d x 53"...             Mahogany Demilune Table   Demilune table with Mahogany Association #184 sticker inside drawer. Looks like a federal style inlay. Bottom has stamps indicating English...    Demilune table with Mahogany Association #184 sticker inside drawer.  Looks...             Antique Kukri   Has a leather wrapped wooden sheath with metal plating. Wood handle with metal plates. One of the smaller blades is missing.    Has a leather wrapped wooden sheath with metal plating. Wood handle with metal...             Small Perfume Bottle with metal sleeve...   Can any one help me identify this perfume bottle. It is 1 1/2" tall & 1" wide. The top is a crown with a pink rhinestone in the top of the crown...    Can any one help me identify this perfume bottle. It is 1 1/2" tall & 1...             1996 Hippity Beanie Baby- Rare!   5th Generation Hippity Beanie baby with many errors and P.V.C Pellets and good condition, soon to be authenthicated. I want to know how much this is...    5th Generation Hippity Beanie baby with many errors and P.V.C Pellets and good...        Click to see more featured appraisals!                  1916 Vase & Stand   1916 Vase 400 cm in height Stand 120 cm In excellent condition    1916 Vase 400 cm in height
Stand 120 cm
In excellent condition             B/W 1944 PENCIL DRAWING FROM POW   This picture is signed (name ineligable) Nov. '44 POW There's additional writting but I can't make it out. It appears to be a pencil drawing of a...    This picture is signed (name ineligable) Nov. '44 POWThere's additional...             FLANDERS STOKE POTTERY   This porcelain pitcher is, I think, early 1900's. Possibly late 1800's. It has a metal lid, possibly pewter. It is in EXCELLENT CONDITION. Please...    This porcelain pitcher is, I think, early 1900's. Possibly late 1800's....             Misty Peaks wijmer painting   Misty Peaks wijmer painting mint condition available for purchase.    Misty Peaks wijmer painting mint condition available for purchase.             Old Belgium Castle or Church   The Boy   Please help us with this awesome piece of history. It is a large 40 inch wooden statue that was carved out of one pieces of wood in the late 1500's...    Please help us with this awesome piece of history. It is a large 40 inch wooden...             Independent Escorts in Delhi   Welcome to the Jaskaur Independent Escorts in Delhi is known as capital of India, For Independent escorts in delhi, we are providing you the services...    Welcome to the Jaskaur Independent Escorts in Delhi is known as capital of India,...             Birds in Water Dish   Birds in a Water Dish Goldscheider Birds in Water Dish made in England., Id on't know how old this piece is,1800's but don't knowfor sure. Front and...    Birds in a Water DishGoldscheider  Birds in Water Dish made in England.,  ...             The Runescape Zombies Game   ﻿ For all the ways that the genre has improved, Ultima Online remains. There's the right although Eastern game developers infuse just about any...    ﻿ For all the ways that the genre has improved, Ultima Online remains. There's...        Click to see more classified ads!               Upcoming Shows & Meets           Need a  hands-on
antique appraisal?  Find a  professional appraiser  in your neighborhood!             Search Appraisals      Category    - Any - American Furniture Antique Bottles Antique Toys Art Deco and Art Nouveau Asian Art Autographs Black Memorabilia Books and Manuscripts Ceramics and Porcelains China Clocks Coins and Currency Decorative Arts Disney Dolls and Plush Toys European Furniture Fine Art Folk Art Fountain Pens Furniture General Antiques and Collectibles Glass Glassware and Crystal Home Furnishings Jewelry and Gemstones Lacquer Boxes Lamps and Chandeliers Maps, Charts, and Nautical Metalware Militaria Movie Stills/Posters Music and Music Instruments Other Paintings Perfume Bottles Pottery Rugs and Carpets Scientific Instruments Silver and Silver Overlay Sports Cards and Sport Items Sports Memorabilia Stamps Tobacciana Toys Trading Cards Vintage Automobiles Vintage Electronics Vintage Textiles and Clothing Watches and Timepieces      Keywords                             Recent comments         Re: Audio Lab Consort AL-60 Speakers     Re: Old Belgium Castle or Church   The...     Re: Gottlieb pinball machine     Re: Antique cast Iron Kitchen Wood stove     Re: Stone china pitcher     Re: Misty Peaks wijmer painting     Re: Old Belgium Castle or Church   The...     Re: Painting     Re: 1916 Vase & Stand     Re: MidCentury Lane Coffee Table      See more comments                   Recent blog posts            Collecting Antique Fountain Pens         Collecting Costume Jewelry         Getting the most from InstAppraisal        See more blog posts                         © 1995-2018 InstAppraisal, a QuadrixIT company. All Rights Reserved Worldwide                                      #^$                  My tefaf                                             Home    About    TEFAF    Vetting    Charities    TEFAF Talks      Fairs    TEFAF New York Spring    TEFAF New York Fall    TEFAF Maastricht      Sponsors    Services    Participation    Press    Press releases    Fair images    Exhibitor images    Press Accreditation    TEFAF Press Contacts      Store           Collection      My Tefaf            This website uses cookies to improve your user experience. Read our cookie statement for more information.    Accept          VISIT TEFAF  TEFAF New York Spring 2018  May 4-8  More about this fair  TICKETS            YOUR ART COMMUNITY   Established in 1988, TEFAF is widely regarded as the world’s pre-eminent organization of fine art, antiques, and design. 
TEFAF runs three Fairs internationally - TEFAF Maastricht, which covers 7,000 years of art history; TEFAF New York Spring, focused on modern and contemporary art & design; and TEFAF New York Fall, covering fine and decorative art from antiquity to 1920. 
TEFAF champions the finest quality art from across the ages by creating a community of the world’s top art dealers and experts to inspire lovers and buyers of art everywhere.    Inside TEFAF       22 Mar 2018, 9:40   Inside TEFAF     TEFAF Maastricht, which has run for 32 years, took steps in 2018 to refine the Fair. This was done through adjustments to the floor plan, the creation of two preview days, and the continuation of a high-level focus on the organisation’s world leading vetting standards.   Read more    Tefaf fairs       TEFAF New York Spring      MAY 4-8, 2018  Modern and Contemporary Art & Design  More about this fair  TICKETS        TEFAF New York Fall      October 27-31, 2018  Fine and decorative art from antiquity to 1920  More about this fair        TEFAF Maastricht      March 16-24, 2019  7,000 years of art history  More about this fair            Vetting   A factor that sets TEFAF apart from every other organization is the thoroughness of its vetting.  Read more     HOW WE CAN HELP YOU      PRIVATE    MUSEUMS    CORPORATE        PRIVATE      The fairs provide the perfect setting for an unforgettable art experience. In addition to the public services such as the open guided tours, Fair restaurants and bars, our team of hospitality experts and concierges can tailor your visit to TEFAF to your specific needs and wishes.  What we do for you        MUSEUMS      TEFAF's hospitality specialists are very experienced in assisting museums along every step of the way to organize special events and visits for their patrons, friends and curatorial staff. In line with your specific needs and expectations, we can make all the necessary arrangements for a truly memorable and inspirational experience.  What we do for museums        CORPORATE      TEFAF provides a unique setting to entertain colleagues and clients, strengthening your business relationships while being guided by one of our professional art tour guides. Turn networking into an effective as well as an enjoyable experience while hosting a corporate event in one of our exclusive spaces.  What we do for corporate          A taste of tefaf           Seni Vase    Hiroshi Suzuki    Adrian Sassoon             Portrait of an Aristocrat        Phoenix Ancient Art             Untitled    Wallace Berman    Kohn Gallery             Measure for Measure 19    Bridget Riley    Galerie Max Hetzler             Spherical vase with triangles and dots    Jean Dunand    DeLorenzo Gallery              TEFAF CHAMPIONS THE FINEST ART THROUGH THE AGES AND FROM AROUND THE WORLD          TEFAF    Home    About    Exhibitors    Fairs    Store    Services      General info    Press      Contact    Tefaf    Tefaf Maastricht fair    Tefaf New york fair      Discover art    Collection            Subscribe to our newsletter                   Follow us      Facebook       Twitter       Instagram            Sponsors                           Principal Sponsor TEFAF Maastricht          Cookie statement    Privacy statement    Terms & Conditions    Terms & Conditions Visitors               #^$                                                  +44(0) 1635 553 553  Donnington Priory, Newbury  Berkshire RG14 2JE  info@mallett.co.uk   #^$         Prices for Antiques                               Home  Login      Login Form      User Name     Password     Remember Me             Forgot your password?  Create an account           Subscribe  Forthcoming Auctions  Database Search  Contact Us  Site Feedback        Skip to content                         Boehm Porcelain Thompson’s Gazelles, Sold 2011 Brunk Auctions, $1,416               A Black Forest Mermaid Chandelier, Dallas Auction Gallery, 2014, for $9,375               Chinese Export Qianlong Armorial Plates, Northeast Auctions, 2011,  $1,298               Windsor Settee,  Sold by Northeast Auctions, 2011, $10,384               Serapi Carpet with Petal-Form Medallion, Skinner, 2014, $10,455               Chippendale Card Table, circa 1786 New York, Sold 2012 by Sotheby’s, $98,500               1868 Cast Iron Bird House, Sold 2012, Neal Auction, $2,987.50               A Roll to Loo’Ard, Montague Dawson, 1956 Sold by Coeur d’Alene Art Auction, 2012, $87,750               Steuben Crystal MacBeth Sculpture, Dallas Auction Gallery, 2014, $28,750               French Regence Kingwood Marble-Top Commode, Neal’s, 2013, $6,871.               1886 Ohio Ferdinand Brader Pencil Drawing, Northeast Auctions, 2014, $11,400.               A Lalique Frosted Glass Water Buffalo, at Dallas Auction Gallery, 2014, $687.50               Navajo Germantown Weaving, 19th Century,  Sold by Cottone Auction, 2012, $3,220               Maple Sugaring, Currier & Ives, 1865, Sold by Sotheby’s 2012, $7,500                       Nothing is bought or sold on this site. All items seen on our site have been sold unless they appear in the forthcoming auctions module.Prices4antiques is a completely independent reporting service for appraisers, auctioneers, museums, dealers, collectors and the general public.         Find prices for antique & collectible furniture, pottery, silver, glass, clocks, lighting, paintings & prints, plus much more.             Your best source for pricing and learning about antiques, fine and decorative arts   Auction prices from 1999 to present with daily updates  Full color images for every object  Search by keyword, category , origin or period  Expanded historical background information for many objects, people, and periods  Curated data from large and small auctions nationwide                                      Login Form      User Name     Password     Remember Me              Forgot your password?   Create an account                       Forthcoming Auctions                    Interesting Stuff                                                                              Ohio Valley Antiques      Charlton Hall Auctions      Sponsored Ad      Sponsored Ad      Sponsored Ad        Sponsored Ad      Sponsored Ad      Sponsored Ad      Sponsored Ad      Sponsored Ad                           Top    Skip to content                                      Copyright © 2000 - 2018 p4A Antiques Research Services, LLC. v3.1.15 (2017-05-01) Review our on-line privacy statement or Contact Us       Not Logged In (Visitor)          #^$ This site definitely requires JavaScript You'll have to switch it on or. Download an updated Browser for free from;  or  or               This site uses In Line Frames so, Please allow frames or update your browser for free at.  or  or                                                                Translate this page with InterTran (tm)  Deutsch  Français  Español  Portuguese  Japanese (Shift JIS)  Finnish  Italiano  Svensk  Russian/Ðóññêèé (CP 1251)  Nederlands  Brasileiro  Danske  Íslenska  Norsk  Croatian/hrvatski (CP 1250)  Hungarian/Magyar (CP 1250)  Polish/polski (CP 1250)  Czech/ceski (CP 1250)  Bulgarian (CP 1251)  Romanian  Serbian/srpski (Latin)  Slovenian/slovenski (CP 1250)  Greek/Åëëçíéêüò  Welsh/'n Cymraeg     Please MOVE AND HOLD your MOUSE CURSOR over the little DOWN ARROWS in the translated
                    web page in order to see a pop-up window with ALTERNATIVE TRANSLATIONS.               Search the Index by letter               I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's       Restore that heirloom!                                                                                     Within this Web site you'll find all the information necessary to do any
restorations yourself.
This is a growing site and although we work on it every day there is still
a lot to be done. Prioritizing is therefore very important and your E-mail
requests will further a particular section up on the urgency list, if
you require a certain section please let us know by   If you have suggestions, want to advertise, have good quality restoration products
to sell, or if you have restoration experience and want to supply us with information
that can help to make us more effective. Your input is very important to us.  This site gets weekly renewed, so please refresh this page regularly.                                                                             Need Caning Supplies ?                               I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                                                                                               I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                                                   I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                            Antique and Estate Jewelry Directory  An antique and estate jewelry directory of information, stores, auctions, shows and mailing lists.                                                                                                                                                                                               I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                              I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                           I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                                                                              I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                              I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                                                     I'd Like a Catalogue from Rockler's                  #^$                 [  About Don ] [ Appraisal Form ]      What's that cowboy gear, old gun,  Civil War uniform or Indian beaded dress really Worth?  When the experts have to know what a western collectable item is worth, they
come to Don Cappa for an appraisal. Now you can use Don's extensive knowledge of
western memorabilia too.  You should always know the value of an item especially before you buy
or sell.  Don's estimates of value will give you a realistic appraisal of
actual worth.  You never know, your collectables could be worth a lot more
than you think.  Don's appraisals are  based on the sales of like
items in addition to his  knowledge of current trends in the collectables
market place.  Don's expertise is focused on the follow subjects:     Cowboy items  guns  spurs  chaps  bits  saddles  paintings      Indian artifacts  beaded garments  bows/arrows  tools  artifacts      Civil or Indian War Memorabilia  uniforms  weapons  gear  Discharge paper  letters  photographs      All appraisals are strictly confidential.  Don will also purchase western collectables for his personal collection.     Contact Information   You may use our online form for single item appraisals and an immediate reply
or you may contact me with any of the following means.   Telephone for appraisals  (406)846-0000    Postal address  P.O. Box 202 Deer Lodge, MT 59722  Electronic mail  Appraisal Information: dcappa@q.com                    Send 
mail to webmaster@whitegyr.com with 
questions or comments about this web site.  Copyright © 1999-2013 WhiteGyr,  Web Page Design   #^$            Home  l  Events  l  Map  l  Links  l  Site Map  l  List Your Business  l  Advertise  l  Web Services l Contact            Search 
          by travelways:  Cape 
          Breton l Evangeline l Glooscap l Halifax/Dart l Lighthouse l Marine l Sunrise                                                                                                 Your guide to finding antiques, dealers 
                  and antique services in Nova Scotia, Canada's ocean playground.  NEW  List your business online and 
                  join Antiques Nova Scotia  join now    Welcome to Antique Nova Scotia's newest members!    Regained Relics Antiques and Collectibles 2800 Highway 2 P. O. Box 208 Shubenacadie, NS   We offer a range of Antiques, Vintage Items, Repurposed and Painted Furniture.
We also sell Fusion Mineral Paints and offer workshops.  Opening hours:5pm-8pm Tel: 
                      902-441-6768   More 
                          about Regained Relics Antiques and Collectibles     Banker's Hollow Antiques & Collectibles 647 Main Street Kingston, NS   A little of a lot...furnishings, folk art, advertising, tools, glass & china, art, collectibles, smalls and more. Something for everyone with new arrivals daily.  Opening hours:Sun-Tues closed, Wed-Fri 12-6, Sat 11 - 5. Tel: 
                          902-670-0895   More 
                              about Banker's Hollow Antiques & Collectibles     Granny's Antiques, Collectibles & Gifts 320 Main Street Antigonish, NS   Furniture, Collectibles, Jewellery, Glassware, Preserves, Signs & Pyrex.  Opening hours: 10 to 5 Tuesdays to Sundays Tel: 
                902-867-1177   More 
              about Granny's Antiques, Collectibles & Gifts      Summer House Antiques 6321 Highway 1 Belleisle, NS   Summer House Antiques Belleisle showcases those unique pieces that make a statement in your home, office or summer getaway. I am always bringing in those eclectic items that keeps our regular customers coming in weekly to see what treasures are in stock.  Opening hours: Tuesday to Sunday,   May to November Tel: 
                902-955-4249   More 
              about Summer House Antiques    Aylesford Auction House 976 Park Street Aylesford, NS   Auction house.  More 
                    about Aylesford Auction House     Sunnyhill Antiques 1563 New Ross Road Lower Vaughan, NS ( 1/2 way between Windsor and Chester on Rte 14)   Country furniture, painted furniture, vintage items, quilts, vintage lighting, pyrex, kitchenalia.  More 
              about Sunnyhill Antiques     Alicion Bed & Breakfast 66 McDonald Street Lunenburg, NS   Historic home of Senator W. Duff (c.1911); ideally situated on a quiet corner, a 10 minute stroll to the UNESCO Town of Lunenburg.  
All 4 rooms are spacious, well-appointed, and all with private en suites. 
Free Parking and WIFI Available.  More 
                    about Alicion Bed & Breakfast     Lunenburg Community Consignment 121 Pelham Street Lunenburg, NS   Home decor, housewares, china, glassware, kitchen bits and bobs, antique linens, etc.  Our space is quite small, so we post pictures of furniture.  More 
                    about Lunenburg Community Consignment     The Green Barn 5469 Highway 1 Granville Centre, NS   We carry a wide range of antique and vintage furniture, art, decorative   accessories, jewellery, clothing, and more.  We also specialize in resizing and   recycling used picture frames.  More 
                about The Green Barn      Garage Loft Antiques 10653 Marble Mountain Rd Orangedale, Cape Breton   Large selection of antique furniture, glass, crockery, tools, baskets, mirrors,   bottles, vintage & retro items including toys, advertising, great assortment   of smalls and much more.  More 
                about Garage Loft Antiques      Harris House Fine Art & Antique Lighting 238 St. Anthony St. Annapolis Royal   A large selection of early electric lighting 
                fixtures for ceilings, walls, and tables. If we don't have it, 
                we'll find it. Also specialising in original, signed, graphic 
                art from the 19th and 20th centuries by international masters.  More 
                about Harris House Fine Art & Antique Lighting>>      The Antiques Boutique 516b Chebucto Street, Baddeck, NS B0E 1B0   Recently opened in Baddeck, opposite the 
                Credit Union. Specialising in quality British & Canadian antiques, 
                collectables & Victoriana, vintage chintzware, china, glass, 
                jewellery, linens & lace, fabrics, vintage clothing, Décor 
                & treen.  More 
                about The Antiques Boutique >>  See 
                also The Antiques Boutique listing for restorations >>      Peggy's Cove Bed & Breakfast 17 Church Road, Peggy's Cove N.S.,   Peggy's Cove Bed and Breakfast is the perfect 
                destination to enjoy the wonderful village of Peggy's Cove — 
                one of Nova Scotia's finest destinations and designated preservation 
                area.  More 
                about Peggy's Cove Bed & Breakfast >>     Seitl's Antiques Peter & Margaret Seitl  We carry a full line of Canadian 
                Country and formal furniture, accessories, artwork, glass, china 
                as well collectibles.  More about Seitl's Antiques >>     Dealers Choice Antiques  We are a wholesale antique business 
                that sells to dealers only. I carry antique furniture, 
                imported antiques & reproductions. This is where the dealers 
                buy at wholesale pricing. By appointment only.   More about Dealers Choice Antiques 
                >>     Robert MacNeil's Past China Patterns  We have one of Canada's 
                largest inventories of  discontinued china , silverplated flatware and sterling silver flatware. 
                Our China Registry will help you locate those pieces you cannot 
                find....  More about Robert MacNeil's Past 
                China Patterns >>     ABC: Antiques, Books and Collectibles  A wide variety of old and 
                unusual items, small and large, kitsch and classy, ephemeral and 
                enduring, including furniture, porcelain, glass, jewellery, 
                coins, comics, antiquarian and local interest books. 
                Items bought and sold...  More about ABC:Antiques, Books and Collectibles 
                >>      Clair's Classsics  Located In The Great Village Antique's 
                  Marketplace. We specialize in advertising items including a 
                  wide variety of vintage metal signs, push bars & 
                  vintage toys ...  More about Clair's Classics >>     Curiosities Antiques & Collectibles  Located in the historic downtown 
                core of Halifax , Nova Scotia, our shop is 2300 
                square feet, filled with a well organized, wide & eclectic 
                assortment of antiques & collectibles...  More about Curiosities Antiques 
                & Collectibles >>         NEW  to Antiques Nova Scotia You can now find  vacation accommodation  listings on the site. Find the perfect 
                place to stay whilst you are planning your antiquing vacation. list your accommodation now      Search for antique stores 
                by the located in the scenic Nova Scotia travelways. Nova Scotia is encircled by scenic travelways. These scenic travelway 
                routes follow the slower-paced trunk and collector roads that 
                lead you around the province of Nova Scotia.      Cape 
                    Breton Trails   Evangeline Trail   Glooscap Trail   Halifax/Dartmouth    Lighthouse 
                  Route  Marine Drive   Sunrise Trail                       © 
          2001- 2008 Antiques Nova Scotia. All rights reserved. Some images courtesy Nova Scotia Tourism.com        #^$­                         Daphne Alazraki Fine Art                         Daphne Alazraki Fine Art                         Prehispanico                         Prehispanico             1 2 3 4 Previous Next                Home    Browse Dealers »    By Specialty »   American Folk Art Antique American Furniture Antique Continental Furniture Antique English Furniture Antiquities and Ancient Art Asian Works of Art & Ceramics Books, Manuscripts and Maps Ceramics & Pottery (American & European) Chinese Export Porcelain Clocks Scientific Instruments Frames Garden Glass Jewelry Lighting Medieval and Renaissance Paintings and Objects Metalware and Metalwork Modern and Contemporary Design and Furniture Musical Instruments Paintings Photography Rugs, Tapestries and Textiles Russian Sculpture Silver & Metalwork Tribal and Native American Art and Objects Works on Paper    By State »   CA CT FL GA HI KY LA MA MN MO MT NJ NY OH ON PA QC TN WA    By Region »   Canada Connecticut East Coast Midwest New England New York South West Coast    Alphabetical List      About the AADLA »    Press    About the AADLA    FAQs    Partners      Young Connoisseurs    Contact »    Contact the AADLA    For Members        Search      Navigation Home Browse Dealers » - By Specialty » - - American Folk Art - - Antique American Furniture - - Antique Continental Furniture - - Antique English Furniture - - Antiquities and Ancient Art - - Asian Works of Art & Ceramics - - Books, Manuscripts and Maps - - Ceramics & Pottery (American & European) - - Chinese Export Porcelain - - Clocks Scientific Instruments - - Frames - - Garden - - Glass - - Jewelry - - Lighting - - Medieval and Renaissance Paintings and Objects - - Metalware and Metalwork - - Modern and Contemporary Design and Furniture - - Musical Instruments - - Paintings - - Photography - - Rugs, Tapestries and Textiles - - Russian - - Sculpture - - Silver & Metalwork - - Tribal and Native American Art and Objects - - Works on Paper - By State » - - CA - - CT - - FL - - GA - - HI - - KY - - LA - - MA - - MN - - MO - - MT - - NJ - - NY - - OH - - ON - - PA - - QC - - TN - - WA - By Region » - - Canada - - Connecticut - - East Coast - - Midwest - - New England - - New York - - South - - West Coast - Alphabetical List About the AADLA » - Press - About the AADLA - FAQs - Partners Young Connoisseurs Contact » - Contact the AADLA - For Members           Browse the collections of our highly knowledgeable and experienced members, representing over fifty fields of expertise.           Adorn Antiques        Anderson Galleries        Antiquarium, Ltd.        Aphrodite Ancient Art        Arnold H. Lieberman Buddhist and Hindu Antiquities        Blumka Gallery        J.N. Bartfield Galleries        Christopher Bishop Fine Art        Callan Fine Art        Cambridge Art Gallery        Charles Cheriff Galleries        Carlton Hobbs, LLC        Clinton Howell Antiques        Camilla Dietz Bergeron        Daphne Alazraki Fine Art        Dalva Brothers, Inc.        Danielle Ann Millican        Daniel Stein Antiques, Inc.        David Weatherford Antiques       David Neligan Antiques        Engs-Dimitri Works of Art        European Decorative Arts Company        E & J Frankel, Ltd.        Earle D. Vandekar of Knightsbridge, Inc.        Foster-Gwin, Inc.        Framont        George Glazer        Godel & Co. Fine Art        Galerie Rienzo, Ltd.        G. Sergeant Antiques, LLC        George Subkoff Antiques        Hixenbaugh Ancient Art Ltd.        Hyde Park Antiques, Ltd        Iliad        Jonathan Burden, LLC        Julius Lowy Frame & Restoring Co., Inc.        Jon Eric Riis        James Robinson, Inc.        Joe Rubinfine        Jayne Thompson Antiques        Kentshire        Kapoor Galleries Inc.        L’Antiquaire and the Connoisseur        Lillian Nassau        Leo Kaplan, Ltd.        Louis Wine Ltd.        A La Vieille Russie        Marcy Burns American Indian Art        Maison Gerard        Mary Helen McCoy Fine Antiques        Medusa Ancient Art, Ltd.        Michael Pashby Antiques        M. Topalian Inc.        Maria & Peter Warren Antiques        Naga Antiques        Nesle, Inc.        N.P. Trent Antiques        Orientations Gallery        O’Sullivan Antiques        Prehispanico        Philip Colleck, Ltd.        Peter Pap Oriental Rugs        Phoenix Ancient Art        Quadrifoglio Gallery Oriental Rugs        R.M. Barokh Inc.        Robyn Buntin of Honolulu        Robert Morrissey Antiques        R. Kaller-Kimche, Inc.        Robert J. Riesberg Antiques        Rehs Galleries, Inc.        Ritter Antik Inc.        Royal-Athena Gallery        Robert Simon Fine Art        Robyn Turner Gallery        Safani Gallery, Inc.        Schillay Fine Art, Inc.        Spencer Marks, Ltd.        Sarah Stocking Fine Vintage Posters        Suchow & Seigel        Sandra Whitman        Thomas K. Libby        The Roman Goronok Company        Thomas Nygard Gallery        The Schwarz Gallery        Vojtech Blau        Yew Tree House Antiques            About the AADLA  The Art and Antique Dealers League of America, Inc., is the oldest and principal antiques and fine arts organization in America.  To purchase antiques or fine art with absolute confidence, look for the blue and gold plaque and Member Certificate of the Art and Antique Dealers League of America, Inc.  The League represents over 110 plus members in 60 fields of expertise.   Contact the AADLA  PO Box 2066 Lenox Hill Station New York, NY 10021  Telephone: (212) 879-7558 Fax: (212) 772-7197  secretary@artantiquedealersleague.com        ©AADLA, 2017.  aadla.com                          #^$   Skip to main content    Home  Asian Art in London Participants  Limited Edition Print  Map  Award  < block >  About AAL  Calendar 2017  Archive 2016  Archive 2015   Partners Sponsors  Partners  Media Partners  Museums & Institutions   Press Quotes about aal  Press Coverage  Promotional video   Contact Contact form  Terms & Conditions       Search form  |      |    Search this site                          Toogle Menü     Asian Art in London 1 st November - 10 th November 2018               English 繁體中文 Asian Art in London is a globally recognised event that has for over 20 years attracted top Asian art dealers, prime auction houses and leading museums and institutions, to promote London as a centre of expertise for the finest Asian art, from antique to contemporary.  It is dedicated to promoting its participating dealers and auction houses via a series of selling exhibitions, auctions, symposia and lectures.    Download the 2017 Guidebook   一年一度的亞洲藝術在倫敦, 匯聚了超過六十家世界知名的亞洲藝術商、拍賣行與博物館,  舉辦為期10天歡慶亞洲藝術的盛會.
來自世界各地的訪客齊聚於倫敦, 參加藝廊展銷及拍賣活動. 同時進行一系列專題討論會及演講.    Download the 2017 Guidebook                                                                                   0 1 2 3 4 5               #^$                        Login  Register            Dealer Directory   Find Dealers  Find Antiques  Submit a Listing     Info, Maps & Guides   Directions  Area Info  Brimfield Survival Guide  Brimfield Show Map  Where To Stay in Brimfield  Helpful Links  Pocket Guide Archives     Show Dates    May 2018   May 8 - 13     July 2018   July 10 - 15     September 2018   September 4 - 9       Photo/Video Gallery   Photo Gallery  Video Gallery     Contact   Contact Brimfield Exchange  About Brimfield Exchange      Toggle navigation                         Brimfield Dealer Directory             Directions to Brimfield Flea Market             Parking and ATMs at the Brimfield Antique Show                    Welcome to Brimfield Exchange  Brimfield is home of the world famous antique flea market, also known as the largest seasonal, outdoor event of its kind in all of North America.         Brimfield Dealer Directory             Dealers         Brimfield Antique Directory             Antiques         Information About Brimfield Area             Area Info         Brimfield Survival Guide             Guides         Brimfield Show Map             Maps         Stay Near Brimfield             Hotels         Helpful Links             Links         Photo/Video Gallery             Gallery            Brimfield’s Dealer List and Directory  Brimfield Exchange is the definitive dealer directory for the Brimfield Antique Shows. Find dealers, antiques and collectable's using Brimfield Exchange's Show Directory or Dealer Directory in Brimfield, MA home of the largest antique flea market.          Brimfield Exchange updates and revises a list of registered dealers of the Brimfield Shows in a searchable online database with links to many of the dealers personal websites or online stores. Looking for someone or something? Hunting for Antiques in Brimfield is fun. If you are looking for antique furniture in Brimfield, paintings, books, architectural, garden, glassware, nautical, vintage, clothing, clocks, jewelry, tools or something else, you can begin your search now! Visit the Brimfield Antique Show Dealer Directory .  Directions, Maps and Guides  FREE Map & Easy Directions to Brimfield, MA. Looking for a nice hand held navigation tool with directions to the Brimfield Antique Shows? Try one you can print yourself. Map includes all major highways leading to and from the Antique Show. Download and Print Brimfield Map & Show Schedule.    Brimfield Antique Show Dealer Map  View the Brimfield Antique Show Dealer Map with show links – Once you arrive, you will need a Map with all the different Show (Field) Locations. This map has online links to each show and lists dealers signed up in the Brimfield Exchange dealer directory. See Brimfield Map . Find Brimfield Promoter Phone Numbers.  Brimfield Hotels, Motels, Inns and Bed & Breakfasts  Need a place to stay for the Brimfield Show? Find listings of Brimfield Hotels and Motels located in Sturbridge, Ludlow, Chicopee, Auburn, Springfield, West Springfield, Worcester and Connecticut. Find a complete list of Bed & Breakfast and Inns in Brimfield, MA .  Everybody gets Hungry – After walking the fields all day, you may just want to get out of town and find a place to grab a bite to eat. See our List of Restaurants in the Brimfield Area  Which Airports service Brimfield? There are 5 airports within 90 minutes of the show. SEE ALL Airport Options near Brimfield, MA - Still Have Questions? Try our Brimfield Survival Guide and Helpful Tips List .            Parking / ATM    Info About Parking and ATMs                    Directions    Directions to Brimfield                  Contact    Contact Us                      Guide to Brimfield    Visit Guide to Brimfield                              About Brimfield Exchange  Brimfield Exchange is a Dealer Directory for the Famous Brimfield Antique Shows.     Contact Information  Phone: (413) 245-0961 - Email Brimfield Exchange 11 Palmer Ave. P.O. Box 459 Brimfield, MA 01010    Brimfield Shed   Brimfield Shed builds an assortment of Chicken Coops, Small Sheds and Raised Garden Beds.          © 2018 - BrimfieldExchange.com - All Rights Reserved - Developed by Derick Cummings     Home  Dealer Login  Terms & Conditions  Privacy Policy  Contact                            #^$  WELCOME TO  CAGLE'S ANTIQUE CORNER    Cagle's
Antique Corner-Home  Cagle'sAntique
Catalog  Our
EBAY Auctions   Ordering/Policies Information  Wish
List  About
Us  Our Favorite
Links  Western
PA Dealers        We
    are located in NW Pennsylvania and carry a General Line of Antiques, but are especially
    fond of Folk Art, Victoriana and American primitive furniture and accessories. Browse our CATALOG where you will find a selection of our current
    offerings. We will also be happy to try to locate an item for you. Leave your request on
    our WISH LIST.  You can also check out our auctions on Ebay.        "Blessed are the peacemakers, for they shall be called the children of God".
"  Matthew 5:9       Check out our
    Auctions on Ebay          BUYING
    ANTIQUES, SINGLE ITEM OR ENTIRE ESTATE.  Please call or E-mail if you have antiques to
    sell.        Find Your Favorite
    Books on Antiques and Collectibles.          Click On the Banner for the Local Forecast    Contact Information: Cagle's
    Country Classics  Saegertown, PA 16433  Phone (814) 763-2024  To send e-mail Click Here   PROMOTE YOUR WEBSITE:      #^$                                                                          Find
            an Item                           Search
                    titles and descriptions.                    Browse by Category                  Advertising  Art  Art
              Deco  Art
              Nouveau  Books  Breweriana  China
              & Dinnerware  Clocks
              & Watches  Coins
              & Currency  Comics  Computers  Cottages
              & Buildings mini  Disneyana  Dolls  Figurines  Furniture
              & Accessories  Gifts  Glass  Hobbies  Holiday
              & Seasonal  Jewelry  Kitchen  Kitchen
              Collectibles  Lamps
              & Lighting  Memorabilia  Metalware  Militaria  Miscellaneous  Music
              Related  Native
              American  Orientalia
              & Asian  Paper
              & Ephemera  Photographica  Porcelain
              & Pottery  Primitives  Religious  Silver  Sports  Stamps  Steins
              Jugs Mugs  Textiles  Tobacciana  Toys  Transportation  Vintage
              Clothing  Worlds
              Fairs & Expos Everything
              Else                  Browse by Price                  Under $5  $5 - $9  $10 - $24  $25 - $49  $50 - $99  $100 - $249  $250 - $999  $1,000 - $2,499  $2,500 - $9,999  $10,000 and up                                           Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Spring Fling April Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, teaset, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Spring Fling Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, teaset, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Happy Easter and Spring Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Happy St. Patrick's Day Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   March Madness Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Happy St. Patrick's Day Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   President's Day Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Happy Valentine's Day Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.               Imperfect Perfection   Happy Valentine's Day from Imperfect Perfection.
Come by and check out our selections.               Donna's Korner Kollectibles   Happy Valentine's Day Sale. Dolls, accessories, figurines, plush, more. Coupon Code DKK5 for 5 percent off orders $250.00 up; DKK1 for 3 percent off orders $85.00-$249.99.                              Find a Store                                  Enter a full
                                  or partial store name                              Our Suggestions                       All
                                Collector Online showcases!  All
                                TIAS.com showcases!                         Antique
                                Business Newsletter                   Enter Email
                                        Address to Subscribe:           Read Current
                                        Issue or View Archives                                             About
      Collector Online™ | Registering | Advertise
      With Us | Trust &
      Safety Program  Announcements | Security &
      Privacy | Terms of Use           Copyright 1997-2016 TIAS.com. All rights reserved.                #^$             New Merchandise  New Merchants  Special Offers     Special Offers & Sales for April 19, 2018    New Merchandise    New Merchants    Classified Ads                Categories   314,631 items for sale today      Advertising (15640)    Automobile (1773)    Aviation (486)    Boards and Signs (133)    Dairy (199)    Distillery (489)    Farm (97)    Food (2939)    Mr Peanut (8)      Gas Station (425)    Key Chains (190)    Magazine Ads (160)    Signs (17)    Soda (1227)    7Up (6)    A and W (19)    Coca Cola (341)    Dr Pepper (5)    Hires    Mountain Dew (1)    Pepsi (39)      Souvenir and Premium (829)    Tins (493)    Utilities (172)      Architectural Antiques (303)    Decorative (62)    Tiles (61)    Wood      Doors (8)    Fencing    Wrought Iron      Fireplace Mantels    Hardware (47)    Keys and Locks (4)    Metal (3)    Old Wood    Plumbing Fixtures (1)    Stone (3)    Weather Vanes    Windows (8)    Stained Glass (8)        Art (5061)    Antique Art (91)    Calendar and Pinup (168)    Cartoon and Comic (2)    Ceramics (158)    Contemporary Art (108)    Ethnographic (111)    Folk Art (249)    Frames (158)    Glass (36)    Hardstone    Illustration (710)    Ivory (26)    Animals and Birds (21)    Continental    India and Egypt    Inuit and Alaskan    Misc    Netsukes    Oriental Figures      Modern Art (2)    Multiple Techniques (48)    Paintings (259)    Original Limited Editions (5)      Photographic Images (22)    Primitives    Prints (1815)    Harpers Weekly (42)    Limited Editions (74)    Originals (2)      Woodblock (111)      Statuary and Sculpture (81)      Art Deco (138)    Aluminum (5)    Architectural (2)    Bakelite (8)    Barware (7)    Ceramics (33)    Chrome    Clocks (3)    Electricity Related items (2)    Glass (28)    Handbags and Accessories    Jewelry    Lighting (4)      Art Nouveau (42)    Furniture    Handbags and Accessories    Jewelry    Lighting    Metalware (38)      Arts and Crafts Era (144)    Architectural    Furniture    Lighting (4)    Metalware (47)    Pottery (39)    Textiles      Autographs (306)    Celebrities and Entertainers (5)    Civil War (190)    Historical (9)    Military    Political (100)      Bed Bath and Vanity (1353)    Accessories (421)    Avon (7)    Boxes and Jars (154)    Dresser (10)    Pill (7)    Powder    Sets (18)      Celluloid (9)    Compacts (130)    Grooming (45)    Brushes (2)    Combs    Manicure    Sets (1)    Shaving (26)      Hatpins and Holders (88)    Mirrors (4)    Dresser (1)    Hand (1)      Perfumes (256)    Enamel    Glass (189)    Porcelain    Pottery    Silver      Powder Jars and Puff Boxes (50)    Trays (42)      Books (11014)    1st Editions (195)    Childrens (2858)    Arts and Crafts (22)    Board and Shape    Coloring (79)    School (28)    Young Adult (127)      Cooking (2796)    Fiction (1029)    Adventure (165)    Fantasy (13)    Horror (7)    Humor (31)    Mystery (36)    Romance (183)    Thrillers (32)    Western (32)      Nonfiction (2845)    Art (173)    Arts and Crafts (369)    Atlases (2)    Biography (80)    Collecting (589)    Family Life (16)    Childbirth and Infant Care (2)    Family Humor (7)    Health Nutrition Beauty (6)    Parenting (1)    Social Skills for Children      Geography (21)    Government and Politics (134)    History (271)    Home and Garden (134)    Medical (8)    Science (16)    Textbooks (11)    Travel (24)      Poetry (68)    Private Publication (32)    No ISBN (32)      Religious (138)    Science Fiction (88)    Signed by Author (6)    Technical (119)    Science and Math (4)        Breweriana (2039)    Advertising (684)    Barware (91)    Bottle Openers (31)    Cocktail Shakers    Corkscrews    Signs (2)    Steins Jugs Mugs (458)    Beer Company (64)    Budweiser (49)      Contemporary (77)    Reco    Royal Doulton (6)    Vintage (103)      Trays (5)      China and Dinnerware (25416)    222 Fifth (Pts International) (107)    A La Carte    A Tuboi    Abalone (6)    Abbot Collection    Abingdon (17)    ACF (1)    ACI (1)    ACR    Acsons (5)    Action Industries (2)    Adams (22)    Adderley (6)    Ahrenfeldt Charles (1)    Aladdin    Albert Pick    Alco (3)    Alliance    Alpine Mountain (1)    Altrohlau    Aluminite Frugler    Amboss (1)    AMC (7)    Amcrest (2)    Amcrest Meito    Amefa (12)    Amere (3)    American Atelier (25)    American Cut    American Hearthside    American Heritage - Stetson    American Homes    American Manor (1)    American Royalty    Americana Products (2)    Amg    Amm    Ancestral    Anchor Hocking (61)    Apropos    Arabia (13)    Arcadia    Arcopal (7)    Arcoroc (3)    Arita (5)    Arklow (1)    Arlen    Arpo    Arrowstone    Artisanware (4)    Arzberg (9)    Arzburg    Ashley (1)    Asta    Astra    Atico International    Atlantis    Atlas (1)    Avon (30)    Aynsley (56)    B and C    Badcock    Baker    Bakerite    Barclay Geneve (13)    Bareuther    Barker Brothers    Baronet (5)    Baroque (2)    Barratts of Staffordshire    Bauer Eddie    Baum Bros (15)    Bavaria (69)    Bavarian Crest (1)    Bawo and Dotter    Belfor    Bell    Bell China (2)    Bella (3)    Bella Ceramica (3)    Bellaire    Belleek (7)    Bennington Potteries (1)    Berkeley House    Bermuda Tableware    Bernadotte    Bernardaud    Bidasoa    Bill Goldsmith    Biltons    Bing and Grondahl (2)    Birks    Black Knight    Blair    Blakely (10)    Bloch & Co    Block (37)    Block Bidasoa    Blue Danube (4)    Blue Ridge (46)    Blue Willow (3)    Boch    Boda Shop    Bohemia Ceramic Work (11)    Bohemian (2)    Bond China    Bonny Products (1)    Boote T and R    Booths (22)    Bradlees    Brastoff Sascha (2)    Brendan    Brentwood (3)    Briard Georges (6)    Brickoven (9)    Bristol (7)    British Anchor    Broadhurst    Brock (4)    Buffalo (12)    Burford Bros% (1)    Burgess and Leigh    Butter Pats (1)    Calderoni    Caleca (1)    Calhoun Nancy (18)    Calvin Klein (1)    Cambridge (3)    Cambridge Silversmith (103)    Camelot (25)    Canonsburg (28)    Canopy    Caribe    Carico (2)    Carlsbad    Carlsbad Mark and Gutherz    Carlton (6)    Carriage House (7)    Carrigaline (1)    Carvel Hall (1)    Castle    Castle Court (5)    Castleton (3)    Casual Ceram (1)    Cathedral    Caverswall (4)    Celadon    Celebrity (2)    Celebrity Of Hawaii    Celeste (1)    Cellar (5)    Century (12)    Century Service (20)    Ceralene    Ceramic Guild    Certified (9)    Certified International (48)    Chadds Ford    Chantham    Charles Ahrenfeldt (6)    Charter Club    Chatham    Cherry    China    China Garden (2)    China Pearl (26)    Chodziez (6)    Christina    Christineholm (4)    Churchill (24)    Ciera    Cipa    Citation (35)    Claridge (6)    Classic Collectors Studio    Classic Traditions (1)    Cleveland    Cloverleaf    Cmielow    Coalport (81)    Coca-Cola    Colclough    Collector Plates (1459)    Elvis (26)    Hamilton Collection (240)    Heritage Mint    Knowles (33)    Royal Worcester (3)    Hamilton (3)      Schmid-Berta Hummel    Sports Impressions    Wedgwood    Wilton Armetale Dated Pewter (21)      Colony    Colony House    Colorstone    Community China    Concorde    Continental (1)    Contour China    Cooks Bazaar (3)    Cooks Club (6)    Cordella (6)    Cordon Bleu (7)    Coreling (1)    Corning (1971)    Coronet    Correct Table Service    Cosmos (2)    Country Casual    Country Cupboard    Country Glen    Country Ware (9)    Couture    Coventry (21)    Covington (7)    Craftsman    Crate & Barrel (13)    Creative (43)    Creative Manor    Crescent    Crestwood    Cris DArques - Durand (4)    Cronin (8)    Crooksville (19)    Crown (3)    Crown China (14)    Crown Corning    Crown Dorset (1)    Crown Ducal (3)    Crown Empire (18)    Crown Lynn (2)    Crown Manor    Crown Ming (21)    Crown Royal    Crown Staffordshire (2)    Crown Sterling    Crown Trent (1)    Crown Victoria (4)    CTSI    Cuisinart (13)    Culinary Arts (7)    Cumberland    Cunningham and Pickett (8)    Currier and Ives    Cuthbertson (3)    Czechoslovakia (7)    Dalia (2)    Daniele    Dansico    Dansk (303)    Davenport    Dayton Hudson    Decostone    Denby (160)    Department 56 (1)    Deville    Devonware    Diamond (19)    Dior Christian (12)    Direction    Dj (1)    Dollar Tree    Dolphin (2)    Domestications    Donegal Parian (1)    Duchess (5)    Dudson    Dunoon (4)    Dynasty (9)    Easterling (11)    Eastern    Edelstein (7)    Edgerton (1)    Ekco (68)    Elite Creation    Elizabethan    Embassy    Empire Crafts (3)    Empress (10)    Enesco (29)    England (146)    English Ironstone (21)    English Wade    Epiag (1)    Epic (2)    Epoch (61)    Erphila    Eschenbach    Essential Home    Essentials (1)    Essex (1)    Estate (2)    Estia (15)    Eterna    Europa (11)    Everbrite    Excel (28)    F C Co (2)    Fabrik    Faience (2)    Fairfield (9)    Fairwinds    Fairwood Schonwald (1)    Farberware (94)    Fascino    Fashion Manor (28)    Fashion Royale    Favolina (1)    Federalist    Figgjo (3)    Fine Arts (3)    Fine China M (11)    Fine China of China (27)    Fine China of Japan (179)    Finesse (3)    Fire King (144)    Firth (1)    Fitz and Floyd (47)    Flair    Flint (3)    Flintridge (7)    Florenteen (6)    Florida Marketplace    Foley (12)    Folk Craft    Fondeville    Ford & Sons    Forest    Fostoria (9)    Four Crown China    Franciscan (465)    Franconia    Frankoma (17)    French Saxon (4)    Friedrich    FTD    Fuji    Fukagawa (1)    Furio (34)    Furnival (7)    Furstenberg    Gabbay    Gambles (4)    Garden Festival    Gei (1)    Gei Design Corp    Gense (6)    Genuine (2)    George WS (34)    Georgian    Gibson (112)    Gibson Overseas (2)    Gien    Gildhar (1)    Ginkgo (2)    Ginori Richard    GKRO    Gladstone (2)    Glass (4)    Orrefors (4)      Glassbake    Godinger (1)    Goebel (14)    Gold    Gold Castle (11)    Gold Coast (6)    Gold Standard    Gold Standard (Japan) (1)    Golden Crown    Gordon Robert    Gorham (39)    Gourmet Settings (14)    Grace (6)    Grantcrest    Grindley (15)    Grosvenor (4)    Guerin    Guy Buffet (1)    H and C    Habitat (2)    Hackefors    Hakusan    Hall (194)    Halmstad    Halsey    Hammersley (16)    Hampton (4)    Hampton Forge (2)    Hampton Silversmith (44)    Hamptonsmith (4)    Handpainted    Hanover (13)    Happy Home    Hara    Harker (46)    Harmony House (104)    Harrods    Hartstone (5)    Haviland (19)    Haviland Charles Fields (1)    Haviland Johann (62)    Haviland Theodore (11)    Hearthside (74)    Heinrich (7)    Heisey (3)    Henckels (4)    Herend (1)    Heritage Mint (4)    Hertel    Higgins and Seiter    Himark    Hira    Hitkari    Holiday Hostess (11)    Hollinshead and Kirkham    Holly Hobbie (1)    Holly Holidays (2)    Holmes and Edwards    Home (16)    Home Accents    Home Beautiful (5)    Home Essentials (3)    Home International    Home Trends (9)    Homer Laughlin (603)    Horchow (1)    Hornsea (8)    Hotel Ware    Household Institute (1)    Houston Harvest    Hughes    Hull (17)    Hutschenreuther (44)    Ikea    Imari (2)    Imoco    Imperial (72)    Imperial International (26)    Import Association Cr (2)    Impressions De Paris    Independence (14)    Inter-American    Interiors (11)    International (720)    International Tableworks (5)    Interpace    Interpur (54)    Iron Mountain    Ironstone    Iroquois (3)    Island Worcester    J and C    J H Walton & Sons    Jackson (6)    Jackson International    James Chatelaine    James Kent    Jamestown (32)    Japan (292)    Japan (Crest Wood)    Jardin (1)    Jay Import (1)    Jc Penney    Jeager and Co (1)    Jepcor (10)    JMP Marketing (6)    John  B Taylor (1)    Johnson Brothers (309)    Jonas Roberts    Jones George and Sons    Joni    Josair    Julie Inman    Julie Ueland    Jyoto    Kaestner    Kahla    Kaiser    Kakusan    Kalmar Design (1)    Kanedai    Kaysons (21)    Keeling and Co    Keito    Kenmark (1)    Kensington (2)    Kensington Staffords (5)    Kent (11)    Kentfield and Sawyer    Kessington (4)    Kikusui    Kimberly    King Crown    Knowles (74)    Knowles Edwin (34)    Knowles Taylor and Knowles (5)    Kobe (1)    Kokura    Kongo    Konig Porzellan    Korona    KPM (15)    Kristin Lee    Kutani (1)    Kyoto    Lamberton    Lancaster (1)    Lanternier    Lauffer    Laura Ashley (5)    Laure Japy    Laurel    Lauren Ralph    Laurie Gates (13)    Lefton (32)    Leigh    Lennold    Lenox (204)    Leonard Mfg. (4)    Libbey (11)    Libbey - Rock Sharpe    Liberty Blue (10)    Liberty Hall    Lifetime (7)    Lifetime Cutlery (1)    Liling    Lillian Vernon    Limoges (25)    Limoges American (29)    Limoges French (52)    Lindt Stymeist    Linens N Things    Lipper and Mann (6)    Living Art    Lofisa (2)    Longaberger (7)    Longchamp (2)    Louis    Louis Lourioux    Louisville (6)    Lovely (3)    LS and S Carlsbad    Ls and S Limoges    Luneville    Lustreware (1)    Lynmore (1)    Lynn    Lynn's    Lynnebrook    Lynns China (9)    M A Hadley    M Z    Ma Hadley (2)    Maddock John (1)    Maddock John and Sons (3)    Maddock Thomas    Made in China (16)    Main Course (1)    Mainstays (1)    Majestic    Majesticware    Majesty    Mann Seymour (2)    Mar-Crest    Marcrest (4)    Marjolein Bastin    Martha Stewart    Maruta    Maruto    Mary Engelbreit (1)    Mary Hamilton    Mascot    Masons (15)    Maurice of California    Mayer (2)    McCoy (31)    McNichol China    Meakin (3)    Meakin Alfred (188)    Meakin Brothers    Meakin J and G (45)    MeHun    Meissen (2)    Meito (45)    Meiwa (5)    Melba    Melite    Merklesgrun    Merry Brite (14)    Metlox (227)    Meuller Paul    Mic (1)    Midland    Midwinter (58)    Mikado    Mikasa (1026)    Mikasa Eclipse    Mikasa Studio Nova (111)    Mikori    Mikuni    Ming Pao (2)    Minton (104)    Misono (5)    Mita    Mitashotem    Mitterteich (6)    Modern (49)    Momoyama    Monarch    Montgomery Ward (10)    Morley Ware    Mottahedeh    Mount Clemens (7)    Mount Hira    Mountain Wood (9)    Mse (1)    Msi (4)    Muirfield    Myott (176)    Myott Meakin (1)    Naaman    Nagoya Shokai (5)    Nancy Calhoun    Nantucket Home    Narumi (17)    Nasco (35)    National (8)    National Silver (4)    National Stainless (65)    Nautica    Neiman Marcus    Nelson Mccoy (5)    New Creative    Newcor (28)    Nikko (118)    Nitto (12)    Noble Excellence (13)    Noritake (742)    Noritake Misty Isle    Norleans (9)    Norman Rockwell (57)    Nororest China    Northumbria (4)    Norway    Nunome    Occupied Japan (37)    Ohme    Old McNicols    Oneida (1479)    Heirloom (1285)      Oneidacraft (8)    Orbit    Orchard    Oriental (69)    Orion    Orleans (14)    Orrefors    Oscar de la Renta (3)    Oscar Schaller and Co    Otagiri (40)    Oxford (4)    Oxford Hall (24)    Pacific Rim (10)    Paden City (33)    Pageant (6)    Pagnossin (17)    Palissy    Papel    Paragon (57)    Pearl    Pearl Crown    Penneys (1)    Permastone    Pfaltzgraff (869)    Pfeiffer & Lowenstein    Philippe Deshoulieres    Phillip Kingsley    Phoenix (6)    Pickard (13)    Pier 1 (80)    Pillivuyt (1)    Pirkenhammer    Pk    Poland    Pontesa (1)    Poole (1)    Pope Gosser (28)    Pople Julie    Porcelaine De Paris    Porcelier    Porsgrund    Portmeirion (10)    Porzellan    Potter and Smith    Potters Cooperative (1)    Pottery Barn (2)    Pouyat Jean    Premiere (8)    Present (12)    Prestige (2)    Price Kensington (1)    Primrose    Princess (2)    Princess House (7)    Princess Japan    Princess USA (22)    Prisma    Provence    Pts International    Purinton (3)    Puritan (1)    Pyrex (141)    Queen    Queen Anne (1)    Queens (2)    Queens  Royal    Queens China (4)    Queens Rosina (14)    Quimper    R and S (2)    Radfords    Rainbow Mountain (5)    Raintree (1)    Ranmaru (3)    Red Cliff (2)    Red Sea (2)    Red Wing (23)    Reed & Barton (120)    Regal    Regal Japan    Regency    Rego    Reiner China    Remington    Restaurant Ware (412)    Retroneu (20)    Reva Designs    Richmond    Ridgway (13)    Riva Designs    Rivers Edge Products    Riviera (14)    Ro Gregg    Roberts & Belk (1)    Rogaska    Rorstrand (1)    Rosanna    Roscher and Co (1)    Rose (19)    Rose China (4)    Roselyn    Rosenthal (26)    Rosina (8)    Roslyn    Roy Kirkham    Royal (42)    Royal Adderley (2)    Royal Albert (136)    Royal Arden    Royal Ascot    Royal Bayreuth (13)    Royal Bonn (3)    Royal Cameo (1)    Royal Castle    Royal Cathay    Royal Cauldon (1)    Royal Chapus    Royal Chelsea (5)    Royal China (780)    Royal Coburg    Royal Cologne    Royal Copenhagen (2)    Royal Court (29)    Royal Crest    Royal Crown (5)    Royal Crown Derby (29)    Royal Crownford    Royal Crystal Rock    Royal Cuthbertson    Royal Devon    Royal Domino (3)    Royal Doulton (385)    Royal Duchess (8)    Royal Embassy    Royal Essex (2)    Royal Gallery    Royal Garden    Royal Geoffrey    Royal Grafton (22)    Royal Halsey (4)    Royal Heiden (2)    Royal Heritage    Royal Hostess    Royal Imperial    Royal Jackson (2)    Royal Limited (6)    Royal M Yamato    Royal Majestic (2)    Royal Norfolk (2)    Royal Patrician (3)    Royal Prestige (4)    Royal Princess    Royal Sealy (22)    Royal Season (3)    Royal Seasons (4)    Royal Song (4)    Royal Sovereign    Royal Sphinx    Royal Stafford (10)    Royal Staffordshire (25)    Royal Standard (8)    Royal Stetson    Royal Swansea    Royal Taunton (2)    Royal Tettau (2)    Royal Tudor    Royal Tuscan (5)    Royal Usa (1)    Royal Vale    Royal Victoria (2)    Royal Warwick (1)    Royal Wentworth    Royal Wessex (1)    Royal Windsor    Royal Winton (1)    Royal Worcester (101)    Royal Yogi (3)    Royalton (12)    Roycroft Stoneware    S.H.I. (1)    Sabin (12)    Sabin Industries Inc (2)    Sadek (4)    Sadler (5)    Saint Nicholas Square (4)    Sakura (284)    Saladmaster (8)    Salem (58)    Salisbury    Salt Glaze    Salute Ceramics    Sampy    Sandalwood    Sanford    Sango (527)    Santa Anita (6)    Sanyei    Sarma Studios (1)    Sasaki (17)    Sauvignon    Savoir Vivre (31)    SCCo (19)    Scherzer    Schirnding    Schmid (3)    Schmid Design Folio    Schmidt (1)    Schonwald (1)    Schumann (1)    Schwarzenbach    Scio Pottery (29)    Sea Gull (5)    Sears (58)    Sears Roebuck (13)    Sebring (1)    Seizan    Seltmann (12)    Service Merchandise (10)    Sevron (3)    Seyei (2)    Seymour Mann    Shafford (1)    Shannon (1)    Sheffield (31)    Shelley (29)    Shenandoah    Shenango (6)    Shibata (1)    Shinepukur    Shino Stone    Shofu    Sierrastone    Sigma (1)    Signature (33)    Silesia (3)    Silverie (1)    Simpson (4)    Sloan    Society    Sone (7)    Sonoma (2)    Sonoma Home Goods (4)    Southern (3)    Southington - Baum    Souvenir (17)    Sovereign Potters    Spal Porcelanas    Spode (110)    Copeland (24)      Spring    St. Nicholas Square (3)    St. Regis (12)    Staffordshire (75)    Stangl (19)    Stanley Roberts (232)    Steelite    Sterling (9)    Stetson (20)    Steubenville (3)    Stonecrest    Stonegate (13)    Stoney Hill    Strata    Stuart (4)    Stuart Christopher (45)    Studio 33    Studio Nova (24)    Studio Nova (Mikasa) (106)    Style House (90)    Sue Zipkin (2)    Summit (4)    Sun Chow (1)    Sunmarc (1)    Sunnycraft (49)    Susie Cooper (3)    Susquehanna    Sutherland    Sweet Flowers    Swid Powell    Swinnertons    Symco    Syracuse (113)    Tabletops Gallery (5)    Tabletops Unlimited (96)    Taihei (18)    Taitu    Taiwan (1)    Tang Shan    Taste Of Home (1)    Taste Setter (5)    Taylor (23)    Taylor & Kent    Taylor Smith and Taylor (70)    Taylor Stone    Ten Strawberry Street (9)    Tepco    Thailand    Thames China    The Cellar    Thomas (3)    Thompson    Thomson (8)    Thomson Pottery (23)    Three Castle    Thun    Tienshan (185)    Tiffany & Co (3)    Tiffin - Franciscan (11)    Till and Sons    Tillowitz RS (4)    Tirschenreuth    Tognana (1)    Tools Of The Trade    Toscany (2)    Totally Today    Towle (52)    Town and Country    Towne    Towne House    Toya    Tracy Porter (8)    Tradition    Traditions    Tre Ci    Treasure Chest    Treasure Craft (20)    Trend    Trend Pacific (9)    Trenle    Trent    Tressemann and Vogt    Tressman and Voght    Trisa    Triumph (8)    Tulowicz (5)    Tuscan (6)    Ucagco (6)    Ucago (6)    Union T Porcelain    Universal (5)    UNK    USA (170)    USS    Ute    Vale    Valmont    Vandor (5)    Varages    Vernon Kilns (50)    Versailles (2)    Victoria (2)    Victoria and Beale (20)    Victorian Classics    Vignaud    Viletta (12)    Villeroy and Boch (39)    Vina Fera (1)    Vintage Fiesta    Violet (8)    Vista Alegre    Vita Craft    Vitrified China    Vitromaster (25)    Vogue    W.J. Hughes (2)    Wade (4)    Waechtersbach (9)    Walbrzych    Waldman House    Waldorf    Walker    Wallace (56)    Wallace Heritage    Warvel (2)    Warwick (1)    Washington Forge (49)    Waterford (21)    Watt (1)    Waverly (3)    Wawel (1)    Wedgwood (404)    Wedgwood Midwinter (47)    Weil Ware (1)    Weimar (5)    Wellin (7)    Wentworth (4)    West Bend    Westminster (1)    Westport    William Fraser (18)    William James (1)    Williams - Sonoma (6)    Wilshire House (2)    Windsor    Windsor & Browne (3)    Windsor and Brown    Winfield (13)    Winkle (1)    Winterling (2)    Wood and Sons (12)    Wood Arthur (2)    Woodberry    Woodhaven (3)    Woodhill (2)    Woods Ivory    World Tableware (4)    Wright Russel (4)    Ws George (7)    Wsp    Wyndham    Yamaka (16)    Yamasan    Yamato    Yamazaki (4)    Z S and Co (20)    Zajecar    Zak Designs - Debbie Mumm (1)    Zylstra (2)      Clocks and Watches (589)    Clocks (150)    Pocket Watches (143)    Elgin    Hamilton    Illinois (14)    New York Standard    Swiss (80)    Waltham (8)      Reproductions (2)    Wrist Watches (73)    Bulova    Ebel    Girard-Perregaux    Hamilton (22)    IWC    LeCoultre    Longines    Movado    Omega    Pierce    Universal Geneve    Vacheron and Constantin        Clothing (3853)    Jackets and Coats (5)    New (745)    Pants    Shirts and Blouses (7)    Shoes (7)    Sweaters and Pull Overs (23)    Under Garments    Vintage (2523)    Childrens (185)    Accessories (34)      Hawaiian Shirts (13)    Mens (268)    Accessories (123)    Ties (28)        Womens (1866)    Accessories (1308)    Aprons (81)    Gloves (37)    Hand Bags and Purses (387)    Handkerchiefs (129)    Hats (97)      Bottoms (5)    Couture (1)    Dresses (18)    Formal (4)      Outerwear (53)    Shoes (4)    Suits and Sets (8)    Tops (16)    Undergarments (22)          Coins and Currency (862)    Coins (764)    Africa    Ancient (1)    Australia    Commemorative      Canada (6)    Gold (3)      China (1)    Collections    Commemorative    Errors    France    Gold    Japan (1)    Mexico (2)    UK (12)    US (658)    Bullion (7)    Gold (5)    Silver (2)      Cents (210)    Collections (2)    Lots (2)      Commemorative    Dimes (8)    Dollars (46)    Errors (3)    Gold    Halves (29)    Mint Sets    Nickels (47)    Obsoletes (164)    Proof Sets (30)    Quarters (39)    Rolls    Small Cents      World (80)      Exonumia (45)    Encased Coins    Medals (26)    Tokens (17)    Civil War (2)        Paper Money (26)    US (25)    Collections (3)    Lots (3)      Confederate Currency (21)    National Banknotes (1)    Obsolete Currency    Silver Certificates      World (1)      Scripophily    Stocks and Bonds (6)    Supplies      Comics (10423)    Bronze Age (63)    Classic (495)    Golden Age (100)    Modern (2702)    Newspaper (28)    Pre Golden Age (85)    Silver Age (122)    Underground (287)      Cottages and Buildings mini (64)    Coalport    David Winter (7)    Department 56 (19)    Lefton    Lighthouses and Harbour LIghts (1)    Lilliput Lane      Cultures and Ethnicities (894)    African (47)    Ancient Civilizations    Chinese    Egyptian    Greek    Mayan    Roman      Celtic    Native American (340)    Art (52)    Artifacts (10)    Crafts (46)    Pottery (74)      Orientalia and Asian (427)    Antiquities (2)    Art    Bronzeware (1)    Cloisonne (24)    Furniture (4)    Chinese    Japanese (4)      Porcelain and Pottery (162)    Textiles (4)    Trade Arts      Pacific Islands (11)      Disneyana (881)    Art (94)    Books and Paper (45)    Buttons (9)    Christmas Collectibles (26)    Novelty (15)    Sculpture (76)    Tins (2)    Toys (32)    Videos      Dolls (5110)    By Manufacturer (1954)    Advertising (63)    Dolls (61)      Artist Dolls (93)    Berenguer Babies    Limited Editions (76)    One-of-a-Kinds (2)    Other (6)      Ashton Drake (94)    Gene Doll (27)    Accessories (16)      Other (15)      Effanbee (14)    Patsy Doll (2)    Family (2)        GI Joe (4)    Hamilton Collection (30)    Gone With The Wind (2)    Phyllis Parkins (12)    Star Trek      Horsman (12)    Ideal (47)    Crissy (14)    Other (23)    Shirley Temple (1)    Tammy (6)      Madame Alexander (117)    Alexander-Kins (3)      Mattel (479)    Barbie Doll (386)    Contemporary 1973-on (115)    Vintage 1959-1972 (60)    Accessories (58)        Chatty Cathy    Accessories    Family      Contemporary Others-1973-On (52)    Other (4)    Vintage Others-pre1972 (37)      Miniatures (283)    Dolls (112)    Furnishings (133)      Miscellaneous (71)    Renwal (104)    Furniture (95)    Other (3)      Storybook (38)    Nancy Ann (36)      Teddy Bears (254)    Boyds Bears (46)    Hermann (8)    Other (13)    Steiff (2)      Vogue (59)    Ginny (53)        By Material (1615)    Bisque (120)    Antique (114)    German (96)    Other (5)      Contemporary (1)      Celluloid (14)    China (87)    Antique (32)    German (4)    Other      Modern (12)      Cloth (122)    Other (10)    Raggedy Ann (13)      Clothes and Accessories (370)    Antique (11)    Clothing (8)    Jewelry    Shoes Stockings      Modern    Clothing    Jewelry        Composition (17)    Antique (4)    Modern (3)      Hard Plastic (48)    Modern (2)    Vintage (41)      Houses and Furnishings (521)    Dolls (13)    Furniture (249)    Other (184)      Miscellaneous (121)    Paper (134)    Contemporary (1)    Vintage (55)      Paper Mache (3)    Antique      Rubber (4)    Contemporary (1)    Sun Rubber      Vinyl (42)    Contemporary 1973-on (24)    Vintage pre-1972 (1)      Wax    Wood (5)    Antique    Modern (5)          Figurines (6242)    Angels (68)    Animals Misc (2825)    Anri (14)    Ardalt    Armani (7)    Bisque (7)    Boehm    Bossons    Boyds (28)    Cherished Teddies (46)    Cordey (1)    Cybis    Dreamsicles (1)    Dresden (1)    Emmett Kelly Jr. Clowns (11)    Enesco (378)    Precious Moments (278)      Fantasy (26)    Florence of Calif    Fontanini (46)    Roman (46)      Franklin Mint (41)    Goebel (49)    Halcyon Days    Hamilton Collection (247)    Harmony Kingdom (1)    Herend (1)    Hummels (56)    Josef (53)    Kay Finch (4)    Lefton (73)    Lenox China (10)    Lladro (35)    Madame Alexander (5)    Meissen    Memories of Yesterday (24)    Occupied Japan (48)    Oriental (69)    Ivory (16)    Jade    Old Ivory (1)    Pottery (17)    Soapstone (2)      Pennsbury    People Misc (563)    Royal Doulton (53)    Royal Dux (1)    Royal Worcester    Sci Fi (45)    Star Trek (44)    Star Wars      Sebastian (2)    Seraphim Angels (18)    Roman (18)      Sports Impressions    Stangl (10)    Swarovski (28)    Tom Clark (10)    Wade (100)      Furniture and Accessories (1693)    18th Century (13)    19th Century (156)    20th Century (75)    Art Moderne (2)      American (2)    Armoires (1)    Bedroom (2)    Beds    Bookcases (1)    Continental (11)    Dining Room Sets (1)    Fireplace Accessories (9)    Garden (31)    Hardware (10)    Home Accessories (723)    Baskets (56)    Boxes (257)    Candlesticks (50)    Doorstops (12)    Vases (24)    Wall Decor (105)      Mirrors (45)    Occasional    Seating (12)    Tables (19)    Tea Caddies (39)    Upholstered    Wicker    Wooden (89)      Gifts (784)    Art (5)    Collectibles (444)    Decorative (125)    Mary Engelbreit (2)      Entertainment (56)    Executive    Fragrances (36)    Gourmet (39)    Inspirational (2)    Patriotic    Personal (9)    Sports (1)    Sunglasses    Wedding      Glass (15087)    40-50-60s Manufactured Glass (1033)    Art Glass (1495)    40-50-60s Art Glass (177)    American (246)    Cruets (8)      Baccarat (40)    Bohemian (21)    Boyd (47)    Czech (18)    Emile Galle (1)    English (1)    French (20)    Higgins    Hoya    Italian (133)    Lalique (3)    Loetz    Moser    Mosser (82)    Peking    Pilgrim (1)    Scandanavian (5)    Steuben (2)    Stevens and Williams    Tiffany (30)    Webb (1)      Black Glass (37)    Blenko (2)    Bottles (749)    Avon (393)    Figural (11)    Post-1910 (112)    Food (29)    Medicine (6)    Soda    Whiskey (5)      Pre-1910 (3)    Food    Medicine (3)    Whiskey        Brilliant Cut and Crystal (375)    Acoroc    Cristal D    Cristal D'Arques    Edinburgh    Gorham (1)    Javit    Lenox (2)    Libbey-Rock Sharpe    Mikasa (11)    Oneida    Schott-Zwiesel    Wedgwood      Candle Holders (109)    Candy Containers (74)    Carnival Glass (143)    Cobalt Glass (56)    Crackle Glass (20)    Cut Glass (43)    Degenhart Glass (1)    Depression Glass (2192)    Anchor Hocking (508)    Diamond Glass-Ware    Federal Glass (252)    Hazel Atlas (146)    Hocking Glass (98)    Indiana Glass (302)    Jeannette Glass (212)    Lancaster (4)    MacBeth-Evans Glass (68)    McKee Glass (52)    U S Glass (31)      Drinking Glasses (517)    Elegant Glass (1731)    Cambridge Glass (76)    Consolidated Glass (9)    Duncan and Miller Glass (39)    Fostoria Glass (295)    Heisey Glass (78)    Imperial Glass (330)    New Martinsville (31)    Old Morgantown Glass (10)    Paden City Glass (10)    Phoenix Glass (11)    Tiffin Glass (38)    Viking (39)    Waterford Crystal (85)    Westmoreland (139)      Fenton Glass (390)    Fenton Glass New (131)    Fire King (973)    Flint Glass (22)    Goofus Glass (94)    Greentown Glass (15)    Greenwich Flint-Craft (1)    Insulators (34)    LE Smith (31)    Libbey Glass (100)    McKee Glass (5)    Milk Glass (578)    Kanawha (11)    Kemple (5)      Opalescent Glass (26)    Pairpoint Glass (5)    Paperweights (351)    Pattern Glass (1051)    Pressed Glass (261)    Ruby Glass (80)    Silver Overlay (8)    Stretch Glass (1)    Studio  Contemporary (21)    Toothpick Holders (328)    Vaseline Glass (27)    Vases (77)    Victorian-Era Glass (197)    Amberina (15)    Cranberry (31)    Higbee    Satin (21)      Wavecrest    Webb Glass    West Virginia Glass (4)      Hobbies (2745)    Astronomy (1)    Crafts (828)    Baskets    Beading (1)    Candles    Ceramic Pottery Making    Drawing Painting (526)    Floral (6)    Framing Matting    Glass (2)    Handcrafted Arts (46)    Leathercraft    Scrapbooking (138)    Shellcraft    Stamping    Wood Crafts (17)      Musical Instruments (1)    Needlecraft (1665)    Crocheting (323)    Cross Stitch (375)    Embroidery (9)    Knitting (49)    Needlepoint (108)    Plastic Canvas (118)    Quilting (17)    Sewing (444)    Weaving (1)      Pets (220)      Holiday and Seasonal (8116)    Autumn (1)    Christmas (6497)    Elves (13)    Ornaments (4197)    Angels (19)    Bells (21)    Carlton (142)    American Greetings (120)      Christopher Radko (44)    Elves (75)    Enesco (37)    Garlands (21)    Hallmark (2036)    Lenox (31)    Limited Edition Collectible (67)    Santas (9)    Swarovski (12)    Tree Toppers (63)    Vintage (307)    Wedgwood (2)      Reindeer (105)    Santa (18)    Snowmen (7)    Stockings (5)    Trees (7)      Easter (371)    Fathers Day    Halloween (263)    Mothers Day (14)    New Year (64)    Spring    Summer (8)    Thanksgiving (31)    Valentine (210)    Winter (8)      Household (1870)    Baby (1)    Fitness (113)    Health (8)      Jewelry (26414)    Ancient-Ethnic (1509)    Art Deco    Art Nouveau (6)    Beads (588)    Boxes (177)    Cameos (45)    Costume (14096)    Antique (380)    Bakelite and Plastics (844)    Contemporary (2028)    Signed (581)    Unsigned (341)      Figurals (349)    Vintage (8887)    Signed (2592)    Unsigned (4097)        Czech-Bohemia    Fine (2709)    1830-1880 Victorian (68)    1880-1900 Edwardian and Pre Art-Nouveau (47)    1900-1935 Art Nouveau and Art Deco (137)    1935-1950 Retro (112)    1950-1970 (121)    1970-Contemporary (1499)    Pre 1830 Pre-Victorian      Handcrafted (276)    Beaded (6)      Loose Stones (24)    Men (141)    Mosaic    Mosiac    Silver (4406)    Antique (132)    Mexican (628)    Vintage (1067)      Victorian (133)      Kitchen Collectibles (10619)    Aluminumware (295)    Appliances (33)    Biscuit Jars    Canisters (101)    Cookie Jars (1044)    Advertising (67)    Animal (93)    Black Americana (17)    Brush (1)    Disneyana (51)    Figural (24)    Glass    McCoy (18)    Memorabilia (26)    Scenic (1)    Seasonal (44)    Shawnee (21)      Cookware (167)    Cast Iron (22)      Earthenware    Egg Cups (51)    Flatware (1644)    Fruit Jars (205)    Gadgets (644)    Glass (169)    Bowls (2)    Cruets (40)    Serving Pieces (104)      Graniteware (128)    Knives (102)    Mixing Bowls (113)    Molds (155)    Pie Birds (124)    Plastic (365)    Pots and Pans (113)    Pyrex (366)    Salt and Pepper Shakers (1594)    Advertising (7)    Black Americana (16)    Characters (88)    Disneyana (17)    Figural (562)    Food Related (21)    Glass (62)    Memorabilia (8)    Nodder (2)    Nursery Rhyme    Salt Cellar (14)    Souvenir (26)      Small Appliances (14)    Spice Jars (42)    Spice Racks (63)    Spice Racks with Jars (4)    String Holders (14)    Syrup Pitchers (2)    Teapots and Coffeepots (294)    Textiles (74)    Dish Towels (3)    Potholders (14)      Tins (23)    Utensils (481)    Brushes and Brooms (26)      Woodenware (125)      Knives (34)    Antique (2)    Pocket (28)      Lamps and Lighting (1618)    Candle (81)    Floor    Gas    Glass (25)    Hanging (14)    Kerosene (8)    Mid-Century Modern (5)    Miniature (32)    Motion (3)    Oil (23)    Outdoor (37)    Parts (501)    Shades (425)      Porcelain (7)    Pottery (4)      Table (44)    Victorian (2)      Library and Office (530)    Blotters (1)    Bookends (58)    Calendars (2)    Desk Lamp (2)    Desk Pads    Desk Sets (10)    Letter Holders (1)    Letter Openers (11)    Pens and Pencils (305)    Fountain Pens (43)    Parker    Sheaffer (6)    Wahl-Eversharp (29)    Waterman (2)      Inkwells (41)    Mechanical Pencils (29)    Pencil Sharpeners (4)    Writing Accessories (16)    Writing and Stationary Boxes (3)      Stamp Boxes (10)    Typewriters (6)      Limited Edition Plates (1187)    Anna Perenna (1)    Artaffects (2)    Bing and Grondahl    Bradford Exchange (578)    Danbury Mint (30)    Disney Authorized (2)    Donald Zolan (58)    Edwin M Knowles (57)    Franklin Mint (14)    Franklin Porcelain Plates (2)      Goebel    Hamilton Collection (63)    Norman Rockwell (98)    Reco (8)    Royal Copenhagen (3)    Royal Cornwall (3)    W.S. George (7)      Lunchboxes (48)    Metal (13)    Dometop (1)      Plastic (5)    Reproductions (7)    Thermoses (18)    Vinyl (2)      Mechanical Devices (60)    Coin Operated Machines (2)    Game Room    Gumball    Vending (2)      Computers (9)    Scientific Instruments (31)    Vintage Electronics (18)      Memorabilia (9102)    Amusement Park (57)    Animals (67)    Birds (2)    Cats (13)    Dogs (34)    Farm    Horses    Wild (6)      Barber Shop (181)    Bells (154)    Black (96)    Bookends    Butter Pats (4)    Calendar Plates (4)    Celebrities and Entertainers (226)    Circus (163)    Civil War Era (827)    Collector Pins (60)    Collector Plates (154)    Commemorative Spoons (34)    Fire Dept (67)    Folk Art (1)    Fraternal (54)    Gambling (16)    Hawaiiana    Labor (1)    Movies (4185)    Horror (1)    Sci Fi (36)    Wizard of Oz (8)      Police Dept (16)    Radio (145)    Rock and Roll (42)    Royalty (284)    Scouting (41)    Swizzle Sticks (7)    TV (1232)    Sitcom (208)      Western (53)      Metalware (1613)    Aluminum (80)    Bookends (14)    Brass (255)    Bronze (18)    Cast Iron (92)    Copper (129)    Pewter (193)    Pot Metal (11)    Silver (448)    Plated (340)    Sterling (77)      Tins (8)    Tole (17)      Militaria (1367)    American Revolution (22)    Boer War (9)    Crimean War (2)    Gulf War (5)    Korea (1)    Spanish American (39)    US Civil War (663)    Medals and Badges    Weapons (83)      Vietnam (2)    WW1 (31)    Medals and Badges (2)    Uniforms    Weapons (5)      WW2 (66)    Medals and Badges    Uniforms (1)    Weapons (1)        Miscellaneous (2467)    Difficult to Categorize (504)    Oddities and Unusual Finds (222)    Rock Fossil Mineral (284)    Fossils (2)        Music Related (8222)    Books    Instruments (106)    Percussion (3)    String (40)    Wind (46)      Jukeboxes    Memorabilia (348)    Classical (1)    Country (27)    Rock and Roll (126)      Music Boxes and Related (112)    Phonographs (12)    Piano and Organ    Piano Rolls (13)    Recordings (2033)    45s (121)    78s (194)    CDs (469)    Cylinders (9)    LPs (894)    Tapes (262)      Sheet Music (5483)    Victrolas and Related (14)      Paper and Ephemera (74153)    Almanacs    Billheads and Receipts (1777)    Calendars (16)    Catalogs (254)    Die Cuts (34)    Victorian (22)      Greeting Cards (315)    Letters and Notes (29)    Magazines (21135)    News (3551)    Antique Trader    Fine Woodworking (1)    Life (67)    Military History (51)    National Geographic (230)    The Outlook      Teens      Manuscripts (12)    Maps (623)    Matchbooks (47)    Menus (19)    Newspapers (117)    Military (1)    Presidential (1)    Space      Official Documents (730)    Pamphlets and Booklets (93)    Paper Dolls    Playing Cards (47)    Political (121)    Postcards (47323)    Advertising (81)    Artist Signed (104)    Black Americana    Expositions (1)    Fantasy (35)    Holidays and Greetings (2000)    Main Street    Nudes (223)    Real Photos (31)    Regional (23142)    Europe (384)    US (17208)    World (5530)      Sets and Series (29)    Topicals (15031)    Transportation (3845)      Posters (40)    Supplies (131)    Theater Programs (80)    Trading Cards (309)    Pokemon        Pets and Animals (670)    Bear (5)    Polar (4)      Bird (49)    Cages (13)    Chicken    Dove    Duck    Eagle    Owl      Butterfly    Cat (40)    Domestic (13)    Wild (12)      Cow (2)    Deer    Dog (68)    Airedale Terrier    Basset Hound    Beagle    Bearded Collie    Border Collie    Border Terrier    Borzoi    Boston Terrier    Boxer    Brussels Griffon    Bull Terrier    Bulldog    Cairn Terrier    Cavalier King Charles Spaniel    Chihuahua    Chow Chow    Cocker Spaniel (1)    Collie    Corgi    Dachshund    Dalmatian    Doberman Pinscher    English Setter    English Springer Spaniel    Fox Terrier    German Shepherd    Golden Retriever    Great Dane    Great Pyrenees    Greyhound    Irish Setter    Jack Russell Terrier    Keeshond    Kerry Blue Terrier    Labrador Retriever    Lhasa Apso    Maltese    Mastiff    Miniature Pinscher    Norwegian Elkhound    Old English Sheepdog    Pekingese    Pointer    Pomeranian    Poodle (1)    Pug    Saint Bernard    Samoyed    Schipperke    Schnauzer    Scottish Terrier (5)    Sealyham Terrier    Shetland Sheepdog    Shih Tzu    West Highland White Terrier    Yorkshire Terrier      Dolphin    Elephant (10)    Fish (6)    Fox (1)    Frog (2)    Horse (49)    Panda    Pig    Rabbit (33)    Raccoon    Sheep    Skunk    Squirrel    Turtle    Wolf (1)    Zebra (1)      Photographica (1694)    Accessories (176)    Cameras (264)    Kodak (37)      Darkroom    Lenses (13)    Photographic Images (810)    Ambrotype (1)    Cabinet (98)    CDV (276)    Daguerreotype (2)    Stereoviews (99)    Tinplates (25)        Political (298)    Bumper Stickers (9)    Campaign Buttons (101)    Causes and Issues    Glassware and China (11)    Presidential (46)    Carter (9)    Clinton and Gore (2)    Eisenhower    Humphrey    Kennedy (4)    Lincoln    Nixon (1)    Reagan and Bush (1)      State and Local (1)      Porcelain and Pottery (18824)    ABC Plates (5)    Abingdon (22)    American (654)    American Bisque Pottery Company (31)    American Ceramics Products (35)    Amphora    Ardalt    Asian (164)    Batchelder (19)    Bauer (462)    Bellaire Marc    Belleek (54)    Bennington (5)    Beswick (35)    Bischoff Franz (2)    Bisque (10)    Blue Ridge (58)    Bottles (21)    Figural (20)      Boys Town Pottery (1)    Brad Keeler (1)    Brastoff Sascha (1)    Brayton Laguna (1)    Brush-McCoy (110)    Buffalo (3)    Burley-Winter (14)    California (812)    Cal Orginal (6)      Camark (37)    Cameron Clay Products Co (5)    Capo di Monte (23)    Carlton    Catalina Island (38)    Ceramic Arts Studio (20)    Chalkware (58)    Chintz (3)    Clarice Cliff (2)    Cleminsons (9)    Clewell    Colorado (200)    Cookson (3)    Coors (4)    Cowan (8)    De Lee Art    Dedham    Dickota    Dorchester Pottery    European (479)    Austria (13)    Czechoslovakia    Delft (21)    Herent      Fiesta (83)    Current (35)    Vintage (10)      Figural Planters (135)    Flow Blue (72)    Decorative    Dinnerware (4)    Individual Accessories (3)    Sets      Flow Blue Reproductions (2)    Franciscan (2278)    Frankoma (132)    Fraunfelter    Fredericksburg Art Pottery Co (6)    Friendship (30)    Fulper (1)    Gladding McBean (8)    Glidden Parker    Gonder (5)    Gouda    H Wehinger    Haeger (99)    Hagen Renaker (187)    Haldeman    Hall (179)    Hampshire    Head Vases (23)    Hedi Schoop    Holt Howard (4)    Homer Laughlin (108)    Hull (148)    Hyalyn (6)    Ironstone (21)    Iroquois    Kelloggs Pottery (2)    Lane and Co.    Lefton (96)    Lenox (59)    Limoge Reproductions (1)    Limoges (39)    Lu Ray    Maddux (4)    Made in Japan (515)    Majolica (64)    Oyster Plates      Maling    Masons (2)    McCoy (376)    Metlox (283)    Mexican Pottery (14)    Mata Ortiz    Talavera      Monmouth    Moorcroft (10)    Morton (25)    Muncie    Nemadji (3)    Newcomb College    Niloak (15)    Nippon (66)    Noritake (63)    Norton    Occupied Japan (187)    Owens    Pacific (118)    Paden City Pottery (1)    Pennsbury (1)    Peters  and Reed (32)    Pewabic (6)    Pfaltzgraff (147)    Pierce Howard (1)    Pisgah Forest    Porcelier (1)    Pottery (223)    Crocks (27)      Purinton (7)    Raymor (1)    Red Wing (72)    Redware (5)    Robinson Ransbottom Pottery (114)    Rookwood (9)    Rose Medallion (1)    Roselane (12)    Rosemeade (2)    Roseville (96)    Royal Bayreuth (38)    Royal China (3)    Royal Copenhagen (28)    Royal Copley (33)    Royal Doulton (241)    Character Jugs (96)    Flambe (2)      Royal Vienna (1)    Royal Winton (2)    Royal Worcester (27)    RS Germany (24)    RS Prussia (1371)    Rumrill (3)    Russel Wright (15)    San Jose    Satsuma (11)    Shawnee (182)    Shelley (49)    Sitzendorf    Staffordshire (91)    Stangl (42)    Stoneware (100)    Tamac    Teacups (294)    Teapots (183)    Temperance (4)    Torquay (18)    Transferware (249)    Twin Winton    Uhl (15)    Ungemach (9)    Universal (10)    Unknown Maker (79)    Van Briggle (9)    Vernon Kilns (16)    Wade (22)    Wade Irish Porcelain (4)    Wallpockets (46)    Warwick (4)    Watt (18)    Wedgwood (95)    Weil    Weller (57)    West Coast    Western Stoneware Pottery (16)    Winfield    Wood and Son (4)    Yellowware (10)    Zanesville Stoneware Co (166)    Zsolnay      Primitives (103)    Dairy and Farm (25)      Religious (1794)    Christian (1703)    Jewish (7)      Resources and Supplies (3017)    Antique and Collectible Shows    Books (18)    Display Accessories (1)    Display Cases (7)    Internet (1)    Auctions (1)      Magazines (1160)    Restoration services    Software (17)    Tools    Videos (1804)      Scientific Instruments (135)    Medical (93)    Microscopes    Survey Instruments    Telescopes    Weather Related (2)      Self-Representing Artists (15)    Art    Dolls    Drawings    Folk Art    Jewelry    Handcrafted    Beaded        Mixed Media (2)    Needlework    Paintings    Pottery and Ceramics    Sculpture (1)    Weaving    Wood      Silver (714)    Plated (427)    Flatware (185)    Souvenir Spoons (30)      Hollow Ware (90)    Scrap Metal      Sterling (177)    Flatware (67)    Souvenir Spoons (37)      Hollow Ware (2)    Scrap Metal        Sports (4497)    Auto Racing Memorabilia (237)    Nascar (131)      Baseball Memorabilia (1198)    Trading Cards (423)      Basketball Memorabilia (181)    Trading Cards (44)      Boxing Memorabilia (40)    Camping    Fishing (189)    Lures (95)    Reels (55)      Football Memorabilia (308)    Trading Cards (43)      Golf (97)    Autographed Items (2)      Hockey Memorabilia (23)    Trading Cards (2)      Horse Racing Memorabilia (12)    Hunting and Trapping (15)    Olympics (73)    Soccer (2)    Tennis (6)    Track (7)      Stamps (1131)    Asia (14)    Europe (17)    First Day Covers      US (935)    First Day Covers (143)    Sheets      World (1)      Textiles (782)    Aprons (6)    Blankets (14)    Doilies (71)    Fabric (6)    Feedsacks (4)    Hankies (44)    Lace (14)    Linens (120)    Napkins (4)    Pillow Cases (29)    Pillows (4)    Quilts and Bedspreads (52)    Rugs (10)    Runners (8)    Sheets    Table Linen (41)    Tablecloths (182)    Lace (1)    Print (43)      Tapestry (16)    Towels (22)    Yarn      Tobacciana (2629)    Advertising (698)    Ash Trays (376)    Cigar Related (33)    Bands    Boxes (20)    Humidors (12)      Cigarette Related (75)    Felts and Silks (6)    Lighters (169)    Match Holder    Match Safe    Pipes (31)      Tools (2147)    Agricultural (3)    Automotive (2)    Gardening (9)    Mechanical (916)    Plumbing (6)    Woodworking (819)      Toys (8455)    Action Figures (261)    Advertising (59)    Antique and Vintage (513)    Banks (257)    Beanie Babies (229)    Retired (69)      Cast Iron (70)    Character Collectibles (590)    Childrens Dishes (278)    Diecast (854)    Ertl (130)      Educational (71)    Games (1740)    Hotwheels and Matchbox (190)    Lead Soldiers (8)    Marbles (189)    Marionettes (44)    Miniatures (105)    Models (360)    Movie Related (65)    Pedal Cars (20)    Pokemon (1)    Sci Fi (32)    Star Trek (31)      Slot Cars (3)    Star Wars (116)    Stuffed Animals (326)    Steiff (6)      Stuffed Bears (241)    Boyds (19)    Gund (26)    Steiff      Tin Toys (83)    Tractors (13)    Trains (220)    Accessories (15)    American Flyer (1)    Lionel (35)    O-Gauge (9)    Post War (1)    Pre War        Marx (1)    Thomas (20)      Transformers    Video Games (1)    Vintage (301)    Puzzles (107)      Virtual Pets (18)    Windup (62)    Vintage (53)        Transportation (3068)    Airline (1)    China      Auto (108)    Auto Thrill Shows (105)      Automotive (1947)    Cars (418)    Farm Equipment (1)    Trucks (133)      Aviation (38)    Space Flight    Spaceflight      Horse Drawn (1)    License Plates (4)    Motorcycles (272)    Nautical (214)    Ocean Liner    Ocean Liner related (45)    Sailing Ships related (35)    Shipwreck Artifacts      Railroad (335)    China (1)    Steam Engines (1)        Vintage Electronics (43)    Calculators    Computers (3)    Radios (15)    Telephones (18)    Televisions      Vintage Sewing (5571)    Buttons (171)    Kits and Caddies (31)    Machines (3412)    Manuals (3382)      Patterns (818)    Pin Cushions (104)    Spools (16)    Tools (251)    Needle Cases (19)    Scissors (54)    Tape Measures (6)    Thimbles (120)      Trims (43)      Worlds Fairs and Expos (971)    Chicago (545)    Knoxville (7)    London (31)    New York (97)    Paris (1)    Philadelphia (8)    Saint Louis (5)    San Francisco (98)    Scotland    Seattle (60)           Shop by Store Name    Click on a letter to view store names that begin with that letter.    A  B  C  D  E  F  G  H  I  J  K  L  M  N  O  P  Q  R  S  T  U  V  W  X  Y  Z  All Others         Free Fun Stuff   Be Our Facebook Fan  Follow Us on Twitter  Pinterest  Instagram  Newsletter  Vintage Recipes  Clubs  Vintage Web Cards     More Shopping    Antiquearts.com  The source for Art and fine quality Antiques    CollectorOnline  Collectibles    Earthling.com  Gifts, Art & Artisan Specialties    Classified Ads  Buy & Sell Antiques & collectibles      Resources    News-Antique.com Today's news about the antiques & collectibles trade.  The TIAS.com Showcase Antiques & collectibles that were added to TIAS.com today.                                       Call Us 1-888-OLD-STUF     Help  Wish List |  Shopping Cart |  Merchant Login |  Your Account |  Classifieds |         Do You Have Something To Sell?   Sell now                     Advanced search        This site requires JavaScript to function properly. Please enable JavaScript in your web browser.          Community    Facebook  Twitter  Our Newsletter              Make Money With Us    Sell your antiques & Collectibles  TIAS.com affiliate program  Advertise      Using TIAS    Security  Privacy  Terms of Use      Help    Questions answered  Contact us      Questions?  Call 1-888-OLD-STUF 653-7883            © Software and site design copyright 1995-2018 TIAS.COM. All rights reserved.             Subscribe to our Mailing List   Email Address        View previous campaigns.  Close            No Thanks       #^$      North Carolina Florida  Antiques - Collectibles - Vintage  Retro - Re-Furbished          Auctions     Flea Markets        Antique Shows & Fairs           Florida Store Directory            Wanted     North Carolina Directory          apeddler@bellsouth.net  sm S.B.M.S 2017                         #^$           Home  About   Mission Statement  Board Members    Find A Dealer   By Owner Name  By Business Name  By Location  By Specialty  Dealer Map    Membership Info   Benefits  Become A Member  Volunteer for MADA     Online Shopping   Search The Gallery  Gallery Help  Terms & Conditions    Upcoming Events  Bulletin Board  Services  Events  Bulletins    News & Press  Grants  Links  Contact  Join Our Email List               Welcome  The members of the Maine Antiques Dealers Association (MADA) are enthusiastic and knowledgeable professionals who are committed to the promotion and appreciation of antiques. MADA connects buyers with sellers of antiques, and fellow antiques dealers with one another for professional support and exchange – both within and outside the state of Maine.  The members of MADA offer a variety of ways to experience antiquing. We sponsor several antiques shows each year that provide one-stop shopping opportunities where a wide variety of quality merchandise is presented in attractive displays. Many MADA members also have their own stores and galleries, or exhibit their wares in group shops. Other dealers welcome antiques enthusiasts into their homes by appointment. You can also search for and learn about antiques without leaving home by exploring MADA dealers’ own websites using the links provided here.  So whether you are searching for a particular type of antique, planning an antiquing road trip, or looking to join a highly-regarded professional association of antiques dealers, this website is here to serve you.  Happy Antiquing!      Get Connected With MADA!  SIGN UP FOR  OUR NEWSLETTER Receive periodic news and information from the Maine Antiques Dealer Association. Be the first to know about upcoming shows and get to know our dealers more.  We're bringing buyers and sellers together!!         Dealer Highlight Latcham House Antiques Waterville, OH www.latchamhouseantiques.com            © Copyright 
    2018 Maine Antique Dealers Association | Website Services Provided By Helpful Website, Inc.  Logos are property of their respective companies or owners. [ admin | stats ]     #^$        OPENAIR   Market Network                                  Home  About Open Air  Forums  Log In     Home  About Open Air  Forums  Log In            New work on farmers markets!   November 17, 2017  /  Alfonso Morales  /  0 Comments      I’ll likely be blogging about this – Please have a look at this:  Plan, Partner, Promote: Top eight tips to support Wisconsin farmers market outreach and marketing          Denver’s First community-garden-produce-sharing program expands   September 25, 2017  /  mkashchy  /  0 Comments      Read about Denver’s first community-garden-produce-sharing program, Fresh Food Connect, as they expand to help locals living in food-insecure neighbors.  In addition to regional expansion, Groundwork Denver Executive Director Wendy Hawthorne mentioned that the program is also working on creating a mobile application that will license people to manage Fresh Food Connect in different regions.  “We already have Colorado Springs using it; they started using it last year as our first region outside Denver. As soon as licensing is ready, we’ll have at least five communities that want to use it. One in Florida, one in Connecticut, Milwaukee and a few local: Boulder, Longmont…” stated Hawthorne.  Read more at: http://www.denvermetromedia.com/Life/news/local-produce-sharing-program-fresh-food-connect-expands-int/         Milwaukee Farmers Markets’ Nutrition Assistance Programs Availability and Acceptance   August 12, 2017  /  Lauren Jorgensen  /  0 Comments       Nutrition assistance program benefits are becoming widely accepted outside of grocery stores across the country, and this trend is strongly supported in Milwaukee, Wisconsin. Shopping at farmers markets is a great way to utilize one’s nutrition assistance dollars – as the consumer benefits from increased availability of fresh, local produce and the farmers receive a wider and loyal customer base. However, many are not aware that their benefits can be used at farmers markets, so the Milwaukee Farmers Market Connection put together a flyer in order to advance their goal of providing fresh, local food for all of Milwaukee. See the attached PDF to see which markets in Milwaukee accept WIC, Quest/SNAP/EBT/FoodShare, and SFMNP benefits.  MKE farmers market list 2017  A link on more information about FoodShare benefits – how to sign up and who is eligible:  https://www.dhs.wisconsin.gov/foodshare/index.htm         What L.A. Can Learn From Its Failed Experiment in Legalized Street Vending   August 6, 2017  /  Lauren Jorgensen  /  0 Comments         Although L.A. has officially legalized street vending in the midst of a presidential transition, much more work needs to be accomplished in order to make this decriminalization successful the second time around. Despite an initial success in securing a legal vending district in MacArthur Park 20 years ago, benevolent city council members were unable to negotiate terms that made street vending appealing for both vendors and the community itself. The new vending policy has yet to be fully developed and initiated, but it appears council members are more attune to making street vending functional and permanent – which promises paramount economic opportunities for communities, particularly Central American immigrants, in L.A..    Full article: https://www.citylab.com/life/2017/06/what-la-can-learn-from-its-failed-experiment-in-legalized-street-vending/530829/?utm_source=nl__link2_062617  See more: https://www.huduser.gov/portal/periodicals/cityscpe/vol18num1/article5.html         A New Farmers Market Provides Fresh Solutions in Elvers Park   July 7, 2017  /  Max Vichr  /  0 Comments      Arriving on the first day of Elvers Park Farmers Market, opening for the very first time on June 10th, I encountered the busyness like any other ordinary market, but its founding reflects important considerations from the local community.  The market is situated between three lower income communities in Dane County, WI: Park Edge/Park Ridge, Hammersley/Theresa and the Balsam/Russett neighborhood. Its founding helps solve some of the problems many lower income communities face, including community building, proper health and food insecurity. Nearest Stores like Wal-Mart and Wegman’s across the nearby highway are not accessible by foot, but Elver’s Farmers Market is located for convenient access. It does not only boast free parking, but is also situated right off major bike paths (I biked from the Southwest commuter trail). The market also carefully considers economic issues: accepting both SNAP and EBT.  The first day of the market was a success! Fresh strawberries, and colorful flowers currently line the market. Vendors and local businesses excitingly interacted with their new customers and partnerships with local businesses serve important health and education purposes as well. MG&E energy company demonstrated a solar demo and energy awareness, while SSM Health shared valuable nutrition and general health information. The market will serve a very important role in the community, both as a needed space for access to fresh fruit and vegetables, but as an education resource as well.  Resources: http://host.madison.com/ct/news/local/govt-and-politics/a-new-farmers-market-in-madison-s-elver-park-hopes/article_70a441e5-0ae3-5b54-9abf-ea93fe539a49.html           Harvesting Data to Grow Farmers’ Markets   June 16, 2017  /  mkashchy  /  0 Comments      UW-Madison researchers have developed a tools to help collect, interpret, and apply data to expand farmers’ markets in the country.  Read more at: http://ls.wisc.edu/…/harvesting-data-to-grow-farmers-markets           June 6, 2017  /  mkashchy  /  0 Comments      Photos from Dane County Farmers’ Market – Madison, WI             Market Growth and Expansion   April 25, 2017  /  mkashchy  /  0 Comments       Markets can serve multiple purposes. They often “have a remarkable way of weaving into the fabric of one’s community by connecting both regional food systems and a network of artisanal producers of goods to the economies of metropolitan centers,” as stated in “The Best Weekly Markets in the Southeast” by Michael Field. With the help of private partners or local non-profits, some markets are able to grow and expand into notable businesses. Take a look at the success story Jacksonville, Florida’s Riverside Art Market doing just this.        Read more at: http://www.moderncities.com/article/2016-mar-the-best-weekly-markets-in-the-southeast          A Day in the Life of a Food Vendor   April 25, 2017  /  mkashchy  /  0 Comments       Take a deeper look into the life of a food vendor. New York Times interviewed NYC resident, Kabir Ahmed, on his daily routine and struggles of owning a food cart in the city in “A Day in the Life of a Food Vendor” by Tejal Rao. The article exemplifies Ahmed’s dedication and time put into his Halal food cart that is set up just blocks away from the World Trade Center.        The article states. “These vendors are a fixture of New York’s streets and New Yorkers’ routines, vital to the culture of the city.” Without devotion from people like Ahmed, this culture of the city would be non-existent.        Read more at: https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/18/dining/halal-cart-food-vendor-new-york-city.html?_r=0          Bangkok Street Food Market   April 20, 2017  /  mkashchy  /  0 Comments      Bangkok, a city previously known for its renowned street food reputation, will no longer be a food destination of choice as the city launches a ‘clean-up’ effort, according to the New York Times. This past Tuesday, city officials confirmed their plan to eliminate all street vendors from the main roads.  While the removal of the delicious street-food vendors may seem like a loss, authorities agree that Bangkok must address the situation for “order and hygiene reasons,” in order to put the city back on track.  Read more about the Bangkok Street Vendor Market at: http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/bangkok-street-food-ban-vendors_us_58f5d5bbe4b0bb9638e60c15?ncid=inblnkushpmg00000009          « Older posts         Recent Posts    New work on farmers markets!    Denver’s First community-garden-produce-sharing program expands    Milwaukee Farmers Markets’ Nutrition Assistance Programs Availability and Acceptance    What L.A. Can Learn From Its Failed Experiment in Legalized Street Vending    A New Farmers Market Provides Fresh Solutions in Elvers Park             Archives   November 2017  September 2017  August 2017  July 2017  June 2017  April 2017  February 2017  January 2017  December 2016  November 2016  October 2016  September 2016                         © 2018 OPENAIR    Up ↑           #^$                 Online  Antiques       Online Antiques    Site Map  Bookmark this site                                    Tiffany Studios Lamps   We are a full service design studio that creates high quality hand crafted windows, lamps, bronzes and other specialty items. We also have a full restoration studio that restores original Tiffany stained glass lamps, windows and patinas.    Set Up YOUR ONLINE ANTIQUE STORE with us:    Are you an antiques dealer, store owner (antiques shops and antiques stores), auctioneer or antiques related business interested in getting your business online in a high traffic online antiques mall? Join the Webteek community of antiques stores and promote your antiques business online. We can get you and your antiques business online today and you can begin selling for only $49.95 per month, with no commissions and an e-commerce website that you control and where you can post your antiques for sale. High-quality, custom website designs are also available.  We are also experts at search engine optimization for antiques businesses and can get your website and business to the top of Google search results.  Please call to get more details (770)846-6704.
            We offer: 1. Low-cost fully automated database driven e-commmerce websites for $49.95 per month, with no sales commissions;  Please Click here to see an example of our "Standard" e-commerce website  Please Click here to see an example of our "Custom" e-commerce antiques websites  To learn more about us or our webhosting and website design services click here About Us/Web Hosting Services or E-mail Us at:   sales@webteek.com      Online Antiques Stores, Shops and Mall Antique Furniture , Stickley Furniture , Roseville Pottery , Rookwood Pottery , Antique Lamps & Art Glass              - Search Antiques by Category - Advertising Architectural and Garden Art  Paintings  Prints-Woodblock  Prints-Etchings  Other Furniture  American  European Arts & Crafts   Stickley   Limbert   Other Glass  Tiffany Art Glass  Steuben Art Glass  Other Jewelry Lighting  Chandeliers  Table Lamps  Other Metalware  Heintz  Roycroft  Tiffany Metalware  Other Pottery  European  Fulper  Grueby  Hampshire  Hand Painted China  Marblehead  Newcomb  North Dakota  Rookwood  Roseville  Teco  Van Briggle  Weller  Other Radios Sculpture Textiles Tooled Leather Books Catalogs Other                  Featured Shops, Shows, Magazines and Auctions:   GustavStickley.com the Arts and Crafts Antique Gallery - Arts and Crafts Period mission style furniture, pottery and accessories.  The American Art Pottery Association    Bay Area Copper, 1900-1950, Dirk van Erp & His Influence - Catalog Book   Buy the Book          Stuart F. Solomon Antiques   Arts & Crafts Period Furniture, Lighting and Accessories  Arts & Crafts Patinated Hammered Iron Chandelier - Steuben Shades               Information on Antiques  Listings of Maker and Shopmarks  Antique Furniture  Art Pottery  Antique Metalware    History and Valuation  Tiffany Lamps  Roseville Pottery  Stickley Furniture  Gustav Stickley Craftsman Furniture     Have Your Antiques Website Listed On This Page  sales@webteek.com                                             Contact Us/About Us/Web Hosting Services | FAQ | Shops of Webteek   Shops and Links | More Links | Privacy  Copyright 2000 - 2018 webteek.com Online Antiques Mall All Rights Reserved                   #^$                     site search by freefind                             Scan our QR code                     Get your own     ONLY $189 a year! Find out how you can get it for $89!  Check out
        these I-board users    AMERICAN ANTIQUITIES
        COMMISSIONED TO SELL 3 ICONIC WORKS OF ART    Click the photo below for more
        information            Visit us on FaceBook, Twitter YouTube and Read our Blog      #^$              Search ...                  Pfizer viagra for sale uk Viagra canada overnight delivery Drugstore vitamin coupon code         Order sildenafil online Buying cialis in spain Can you buy ventolin over the counter in new york  Home Canada pharmacy job market Online purchase of suhagra Viagra generika in apotheke kaufen  Online Shop Levitra generika vardenafil Zovirax over the counter uk Where can i buy viagra over the counter in sydney  Auctions Buy viagra online america Xenical usa Xenical cost uk  Appraisals Drug prices in canada vs usa Order zithromax online Buy orlistat nz  Antique Talk Canada drug store pharmacy Buying generic cialis online safe Buy propecia online without prescription  About Amoxicillin sale online Where to buy kamagra in brisbane  Contact Us                                  Explore Wayne Mattox Antiques     When you enter the shop for Wayne Mattox Antiques, housed in a beautiful, circa 1835 Greek-Revival home in picturesque Woodbury, Connecticut, you’ll find a collection of constantly changing inventory that focuses on American and European furniture, paintings and folk art, and treasures of all types . Most importantly, the collection meets the shop owners criteria for undeniable integrity, interesting subject matter and aesthetic appeal.  Wayne Mattox says, “We sell museum-quality fresh-to-the-market antiques at fair prices”. Wayne is recognized for his extensive knowledge in the antiques market. As a public speaker, Prescription cialis quebec Buy prednisone online overnight  appraiser , writer and auctioneer he is enthusiastic about sharing his knowledge of antiques. Wayne’s scholarly attention to historic merit is augmented by his wife Kathleen’s great eye.  In one of his popular columns for Antique Talk , Wayne defines an antique not so much by its age but what a particular object did to distinguish itself in its day.  “If Peter Max designed a 7-UP bottle form weathervane in the 1960’s, I’d love to place it in one of my customers’ homes - especially if it had wings and looked great!”  It’s the kind of thing you might find in the Mattox’s historic Main Street shop: if you happened in on the right day .  If you can’t make it to lovely Woodbury, Connecticut you can browse our collections in our Online Shop , which we host through the Ruby Lane storefront.  Enjoy your exploration, you never know what treasures you’ll find!        Shop Featured in the News  We were pleased to have Litchfield County based writer John Torsiello visit with us recently. Enjoy his latest article and pictures.   Wayne Mattox Antiques & Auctions combines traditional with whimsical  Wayne Mattox is sitting in his and wife Kathleen's kitchen on a warm morning. The space is meticulously and attractively decorated with subtle colors, paintings. A stove backsplash adorned with antique Portuguese porcelain tiles visually teases you. The couple is up early, getting set for another busy day at their business, Wayne Mattox Antiques & Auctions located on Woodbury's fabled "Antiques Row" at 82 North Main Street.   Read more ...      Rare American-Indian Drum  Wayne shares the details of this rare American-Indian drum.       Dickens' A Christmas Carol   John Dickens, a Naval Pay office clerk, saw to it that his eight children received schooling. He aided their education by returning home from work with cheap reprints of 18th century novels like Robinson Crusoe, Tom Jones, and Peregrine Pickle, that delighted his family. His London colleagues described him as "a well-dressed fellow of infinite humor; very courteous, imposingly so; the jolliest of men." John's flaw was a poor head for finance. The eternal optimist described himself as "a cork which, when submerged, bobs up to the surface again, none the worse for the dip."   Read more ...      Wayne On American Pickers   Wayne Mattox appeared as a “Folk Art Expert” on American Pickers on The History Channel. He helped the American Pickers team with the appraisal of an eagle weathervane that found its way from a barn cupola to a tree where it lived for many years to the barn attic to Mike & Frank’s truck and finally to their Nashville store. This antique adventure has wings!  Click Here to Watch The Episode             Buy Online  Can't get to Woodbury to see our antiques in person? We sell exclusively through RubyLane.com. Check back often for new treasures!   Visit our online shop  Wayne Mattox Antiques       Antique Talk Columns   Want to know more about Antiques and Collectibles? Wayne Mattox's " Antique Talk " columns have appeared online and in newspapers for over 15 years. You can find a wealth of information, humor and research on the art of collecting.            What Treasures Can We Help You Find?  * indicates required  Email Address *    First Name   Last Name   What are your interests?                Proud to be on the Connecticut Antiques Trail!           Wayne Mattox Antiques | 82 Main Street North | Woodbury, CT 06798 | 203-263-2899 | wayne@antiquetalk.com  Copyright 2016.  All Rights Reserved. Site designed by Castiglione Creative                  #^$             antiqueweek.com    Auctions • Shows • Antiques • Collectibles         Search 
      through 1000s of auctions listings by keyword.                    Home  News   Current Stories  Opinions  Glossary of Terms    Auctions   Auction Calendar   Auction Ads  Live Auctions    Shows   Show Calendar  Show Ads    Shop Guide   Find a Shop    Classifieds   Classified Ads  Submit Classified Ad  Book Ads    Advertise   Display Rates  AntiqueWest    Community    Discussion Forums   Internet Connections  Antique Links    Contact Us   Staff  About Us                                 Login            Email        Password        Subscribers Register Or Reset Password  HERE                         4
                  Weeks Free       Register now for access to this website and a free four week subscription to AntiqueWeek .  Click  HERE                            Send
											AntiqueWeek to a Friend    Sign up a friend for a FREE four week subscription to
											AntiqueWeek. Click HERE .               Newsletter Signup!      Email     Enter your email address above to receive our newsletter.                           Cover
										Story                   View AntiqueWeek Online         View the entire edition  online now!  As a registered user to antiqueweek.com you can view the weekly newspaper online. Just click the link below, and you will be taken to the most current issues.  Current Issue                  AntiqueWeek Shop Guides Now Available  To see digital editions, clink links below:  Central Edition  Eastern Edition  For a printed 8 ½ x 11 bound book, please see your local antique shop listed in the guide as they have them available for sale @ $6.25. Or, call the AntiqueWeek office at 1-800-876-5133 and we will send one out for $6.25 plus $3 postage/handling            Pharmacy and soda items will delight at A-OK auction   Article in full    Interest is strong for the unusual at Gallerybfa   Article in full    In tune with Harmonicas   Article in full    Ramp walkers lurch into collectors’s hearts   Article in full    Looking back on 50 years of AntiqueWeek   Article in full    Heart of Ohio celebrates 20 years   Article in full    Tom Mix and World’s Fair all at Gray’s Auctioneers   Article in full              AntiqueWeek Image Gallery        This William and Mary walnut chest on stand sold for $6,875 during a Leslie Hindman Auction in Chicago. Contact www.lesliehindman.com...  More...                              Find an Auction or Show      Auction Show Date   All  January  February  March  April  May  June  July  August  September  October  November  December    All  1  2  3  4  5  6  7  8  9  10  11  12  13  14  15  16  17  18  19  20  21  22  23  24  25  26  27  28  29  30  31   Keyword  State   Select a State  Alabama  Arkansas  Connecticut  Florida  Illinois  Indiana  Iowa  Kansas  Kentucky  Maine  Maryland  Massachusetts  Michigan  Minnesota  Missouri  Nebraska  New Hampshire  New Jersey  New York  North Carolina  Ohio  Oklahoma  Pennsylvania  Tennessee  Texas  Vermont  Virginia  West Virginia  Wisconsin                  Manage Newspaper Subscription
                                            Account       Report A
                                            Late Delivery     Renew Your Subscription     Reset Online Password                    Find a Shop   Search thousands of antique stores from across the nation.       Keyword  City  State   Select a State  Alabama  Alaska  Arizona  Arkansas  California  Colorado  Connecticutt  Delaware  Florida  Georgia  Hawaii  Idaho  Illinois  Indiana  Iowa  Kansas  Kentucky  Louisisna  Maine  Maryland  Massachusetts  Michigan  Minnesota  Mississippi  Missouri  Montana  Nebraska  Nevada  New Hampshire  New Jersey  New Mexico  New York  North Carolina  North Dakota  Ohio  Oklahoma  Oregon  Pennsylvania  Rhode Island  South Carolina  South Dakota  Tennessee  Texas  Utah  Vermont  Virginia  Washington  West Virgina  Wisconsin  Wyoming               AntiqueWeek on Facebook                news | ad rates | auction calendar | subscribe | contact us | about us | Advertisers FTP    © 2006 MidCountry Media USA,
						All Rights Reserved           Meebo('makeLinksSharable');#^$TWIN BROOKS ANTIQUES AND COLLECTIBLES      ANTIQUES AND COLLECTIBLES NEWSLETTER ARCHIVES  TO SUBSCRIBE TO THE NEWSLETTER (IT'S FREE!) CLICK HERE   CLICK ON THE DATE TO VIEW NEWSLETTER.  #1 July 9, 1997 #11 September 19, 1997 #12 September 25, 1997 #14 October 16, 1997 #15 October 25, 1997 #16 October 31, 1997 #22 December 13, 1997 #24 January 2, 1998 #26 January 17, 1998 #28 January 31, 1998 #30 February 12, 1998 #33 March 13, 1998 #34 March 20, 1998 #35 March 27, 1998 #36 April 4, 1998 #37 April 12, 1998 #38 April 18, 1998 #39 April 24, 1998 #40 May 1, 1998 #41 May 9, 1998 #42 May 15, 1998 #43 May 22, 1998 #44 May 29, 1998 #45 June 5, 1998 #46 June 18, 1998 #47 June 26, 1998 #48 July 2, 1998 #49 July 12, 1998 #50 July 16, 1998 #51 July 24, 1998 #52 July 31, 1998 #53 August 10, 1998 #54 August 28, 1999 #55 September 3, 1998 #56 September 11, 1998 #57 September 19, 1998 #58 September 25, 1998 #59 October 2, 1998 #61 October 26, 1998 #63 November 28, 1998 #66 December 29, 1998 #67 January 2, 1999 #68 January 8, 1999 #69 January 15, 1999 #70 January 23, 1999 #71 January 30, 1999 #72 February 6, 1999 #73 February 14, 1999 #74 February 27, 1999 #75 March 5, 1999 #76 March 23, 1999 #77 March 27, 1999 #77A April 3, 1999 #78 April 9, 1999 #79 April 16, 1999 #80 April 23, 1999 #81 April 30, 1999 #82 May 7, 1999 #83 May 14, 1999 #84 May 21, 1999 #85 May 28, 1999 #86 June 4, 1999 #87 June 10, 1999 #88 June 18, 1999 #89 June 25, 1999 #90 July 2, 1999 #91 July 9, 1999 #92 July 16, 1999 #93 July 23, 1999 #94 July 30, 1999 #95 August 5, 1999 #96 August 16, 1999 #97 August 27, 1999 #98 September 3, 1999 #99 September 11, 1999 #100 September 19, 1999 #101 September 25, 1999 #102 October 10, 1999 #103 October 15, 1999 #104 November 6, 1999 #105 November 12, 1999 #106 November 18, 1999 #107 November 27, 1999 #108 December 5, 1999 #109 December 10, 1999 #110 February 15, 2000 #111 March 10, 2000 #112 March 21, 2000 #113 March 27, 2000 #114 March 31, 2000 #115 April 8, 2000 #116 April 14, 2000 #117 April 21, 2000 #118 April 28, 2000 #119 May 5, 2000 #120 May 15, 2000 #121 May 19, 2000 #122 May 26, 2000 #123 June 3, 2000 #124 June 9, 2000 #125 June 23, 2000 #126 July 8, 2000 #127 July 19, 2000 #128 September 22, 2000 #129 October 6, 2000 #130 October 13, 2000 #131 October 21, 2000 #132 November 18, 2000 #133 November 25, 2000 #134 December 2, 2000 #135 December 8, 2000 #136 December 23, 2000 #137 December 31, 2000 #138 January 27, 2001 #139 February 4, 2001 #140 February 9, 2001 #141 February 17, 2001 #142 March 5, 2001 #143 March 24, 2001 #144 March 30, 2001 #145 April 14, 2001 #146 April 20, 2001 #147 April 27, 2001 #148 May 4, 2001 #149 May 11, 2001 #150 May 18, 2001 #151 June 15, 2001 #152 July 13, 2001 #153 July 21, 2001 #154 August 4, 2001 #155 September 22, 2001 #156 October 5, 2001 #157 October12, 2001 #158 October18, 2001 #159 October26, 2001 #160 November 2, 2001 #161 November 9, 2001 #162 November 16, 2001 #163 November 24, 2001 #164 December 7, 2001 #165 December 14, 2001 #166 January 4, 2002 #167 January 11, 2002 #168 February 2, 2002 #169 February 8, 2002 #170 February 15, 2002 #171 February 22, 2002 #172 March 2, 2002 #173 March 9, 2002 #174 March 16, 2002 #175 March 22, 2002 #176 March 30, 2002 #177 April 12, 2002 #178 April 19, 2002 #179 May 3, 2002 #180 May 24, 2002 #181 May 31, 2002 #182 June 8, 2002 #183 June 14, 2002 #184 June 24, 2002 #185 July 4, 2002 #186 July 12, 2002 #187 July 19, 2002 #188 August 17, 2002 #189 August 29, 2002 #190 September 6, 2002 #191 September 13, 2002 #192 September 20, 2002 #193 September 27, 2002 #194 October 18, 2002 #195 October 25, 2002 #196 November 1, 2002 #197 November 8, 2002 #198 November 18, 2002 #199 November 22, 2002 #200 November 30, 2002 #201 December 7, 2002 #202 December 13, 2002 #203 December 31, 2002 #204 January 10, 2003 #205 January 17, 2003 #206 January 31, 2003 #207 February 7, 2003 #208 February 15, 2003 #209 February 22, 2003 #210 March 1, 2003 #211 March 7, 2003 #212 March 15, 2003 #213 April 7, 2003 #214 April 20, 2003 #215 May 2, 2003 #216 May 16, 2003 #217 May 22, 2003 #218 May 30, 2003 #219 June 6, 2003 #220 June 13, 2003 #221 June21, 2003 #222 July 11, 2003 #223 August 1, 2003 #224 August 21, 2003 #225 September 6, 2003 #226 September 14, 2003 #227 October 10, 2003 #228 October 17, 2003 #229 October 24, 2003 #230 October 31, 2003 #231 November 8, 2003 #232 November 14, 2003 #233 November 21, 2003 #234 November 28, 2003 #235 December 5, 2003 #236 December 14, 2003 #237 December 19, 2003 #238 January 16, 2004 #239 February 13, 2004 #240 March 12, 2004 #241 April 22, 2004 #242 April 30, 2004 #243 May 7, 2004 #244 May 21, 2004 #245 May 27, 2004 #246 June 18, 2004 #247 July 16, 2004 #248 September 18, 2004 #249 September 24, 2004 #250 September 30, 2004 #251 October 8, 2004 #252 October 15, 2004 #253 October 24, 2004 #254 October 31, 2004 #254A December 12, 2004 #255 January 23, 2005 #256 February 4, 2005 #257 February 12, 2005    TO SUBSCRIBE TO THE NEWSLETTER (IT'S FREE!) CLICK HERE         TWIN BROOKS
        HOME PAGE    Judith's
        Articles About Antiques & Collectibles       Antiques
        & Collectibles Newsletter Archives    About
        Us  Terms
        & Policies  Upcoming
        Events       Advertising  Calendars  Character
        Collectibles  Disneyana    Games   Holiday Collectibles   Jewelry   Ladies' Accessories     Paper
        Collectibles   Valentines   Vintage
        American Toys   Vintage
        German Toys     Vintage
        Japanese Toys   World's
        Fair   Other
        Great Finds   Links
        to Other Sites       Copyright © 1996-2004 Arthur Schwartz and Judith Katz-Schwartz #^$